5. Slumlord Blues
A NEW ailment is spreading through the chattering classes. Symptoms include an aversion to art or literature created in Israel, an intolerance of all foodstuffs produced in Israel, and an allergy to the Israeli flag, the Israeli football team and Israeli professors. If you or any of your friends have those symptoms, get help: it is possible you're suffering from Israel Sensitivity Disorder.
This is a belated birthday card that I have been wanting to make ever since I saw this sentiment in one of my new CTMH acrylic stamp sets called Card Chatter-Birthday. The sentiment says "I didn't forget your birthday..." "I'm just extending the Celebration!" How cute is that, and imperative to have for a procrastinator like me - haha.
I'm never the one who puts the really funny things on Facebook. I'm always the one who sees them when other people put them up. This is how I came across my first comics from The Oatmeal. The ones I saw were mostly about spelling and grammar, like ten words you need to stop misspelling, and they were all FREAKING AWESOME. So when I was in the bookstore and I saw 5 Very Good Reasons for to Punch a Dolphin in the Mouth (and Other Useful Guides), I picked up a copy on impulse for the ultra-erudite pair on my list - my brother-in-law and his wife. Then I got it home and started flipping through it. Eep. There were the ones nobody puts on Facebook. There was crudeness and filth. There were (nsfw! - Beck) dead hookers. So I thought maybe I'd give it to my Dad instead. Then my husband found it. I explained my dilemma. He started flipping through it and waving extra-funny pages in my face, while I said yeah, I said IT WAS FUNNY, that's WHY I BOUGHT it, but.... then I saw (nsfw! again! - Beck) this one and laughed myself into an asthma attack. Now we're getting one for everyone we know. Merry Christmas, Nana and Grandpa!
I am so tired. Since the end of the holiday season, I feel like I've been going non-stop both at work and at home with very little meaningful downtime. But it's all stuff that needs to get done: work, grocery shopping, making healthy meals, exercising, blogging. By the end of the evening, I have very little energy for nurturing my spiritual life, one of my New Year's Resolutions.
We will see!
3) Share 7 interesting things that people may not already know about you.
"I carry your heart" by E. E. Cummings.
3 large red bell peppers, cut into1/4-inch dice (about 3 cups)
So is there a referral system in heaven? It must be like girl-scout cookies, the more you sell the bigger the waiting prize becomes. For every 5 people you can convert, the size of your halo will increase accordingly!… Just as the Lord is great in every other aspect – so is He the master of a most elaborate pyramid scheme!
Chair before:
to be your hope and your guiding star
Below: the drawing tightened and (more-or-less) digitally inked .
I feel lucky and blessed to have been a party of so many wonderful events, but I am looking forward to getting back to life on my schedule:)
The interview above originally was conducted over two marathon sessions on 9/10/01 and 3/19/02. It was transcribed by myself and published in ALTER EGO #32 (Jan/04). It then was hosted on Ken Quattro's Comicartville site from 2005 to 2012. I cannot thank Ken enough for hosting it all these years.
10"H by 8"W, on panel.
We have been on summer break for a month now. I have really enjoyed the trips to the park, the extra time with my son, seeing all of the kids play together, and many other family memories. Today however...well let's just say I am ready for a mommy grown up day. No one slept well last night and it shows in the grumpies today. So, I thought I would make a quick list of things that I would love to do/have.
“An ancient world in which neither Judaism nor Christianity had any place could not be anything for me other than a bright but insubstantial dream. Only the ancient world in its fateful last centuries could explain the world in which I myself lived–a Protestant in an Ireland dominated by a Roman Catholicism which claimed direct continuity with the post-Roman, medieval past, and a boy who looked always to the Middle East where his father worked and where the ancient monuments of Egypt and the ruined cities of Hellenistic and Roman times stood in the midst of what are now Muslim societies.” This shows the importance of the idea of ‘continuity’ on his historical worldview, and how his studies of Greek were more focused on the New Testament and the origins of Christianity rather than the polished, but bygone, world of Classical Athens.
Sometimes we think so much about what we don’t want to lose that we forget what we really have. We take people we know, friends, and family for granted. We think (without really thinking about it) that they will be there for us forever. Now I’m not just thinking about the fact that no one lives forever, but that people they come and go in our lives. At some point we might stop, and realize that everyone are gone. But where?
She sleeps in the narrow trough yet she walks the dust
This is a perfect example of the insanity I've found in other crafts. Even at 18, I was appalled by that entire story and suddenly began questioning everything I was learning from my teacher. If I used what I'd learned from her to make beads to sell, would I also make her angry and upset? Could I use any of this information now?
to translate into language; and when
2) Freedom from Religious-Persecution/Religious-Supremacy.
By Using 1" Paper Circles & Small Rolled Lace Flowers I Created These Altered Clips.
A copy of the plaintiffs’ letter dated March 1, 1990 is hereto attached as Annex “B”.
02. Taurus/Gemini displays great imagination and tends to be very expressive, both physically and verbally.
So how do we graciously allow ourselves exclusive space? When is exclusion appropriate and when is it objectionable? How do we determine exactly how exclusive we need to be?
In search of me
Dr Kayser Enneking, head of the U of F department and Dr Carolina Haylock-Loor, president of the Sociedad Hondurea de Anestesiologia, Reanimacion y Dolor (SHARD) met at the WCA this week for the first time. In an English and Spanish medley, we put plans in motion for a training workshop later this year.
Natalie gets back to the campus, and finds an emergency phone. As she keeps hitting the speaker and calling for help, Natalie hears Brenda screaming somewhere near her location. She sees a light on at the abandoned Stanley Hall, hears more screaming, and decides to see if she can help. Oh, so it's okay to take the time to investigate some anonymous screamer, but you can't be bothered to try to rescue the guy whose pickup you caused to crash? I'm stating to think that maybe Natalie deserves to die at the killer's hands.
Me: Yep. I am now. You’ve inspired me to become more antitheistic. You have given me the greatest revelation of my life, B. The revelation that you were waiting for me to have, it has arrived. Your job is complete. I have finally realised that I should stop trying to be even the tiniest bit polite to the religious. I was never that polite, but you have shown me the way, the truth, and the light that stupid people should be treated with great contempt and pity.
It just goes to show, whether you use a professional camera, a pocket camera, or your iPhone, you can get great shots if you apply good photography principles: pre-focus, good composition, anticipate, steady hands during shutter release….and get out there and shoot!
The thing that's ironic about all of this, is that if we WERE your average garden variety police officer, or lawyer, we wouldn't know enough about the publishing field to know when someone is behaving in a suspicious, scammy fashion. Most of the law enforcement officials we've worked with, we've had to explain, in painstaking terms, how a REAL agent functions, or a REAL publisher functions. Then we explain how the scammer in question functions, and point out how writers are being defrauded. The officers and agents we've worked with are smart folks...they catch on quickly. But publishing is an esoteric field, and publishing scams operate a bit differently than your average con.
Junior Wells: (I Got A) Stomach Ache
It`s 1973 and maybe some of you brothers will have recognized,that I really love these days.Oh god,what a great time for making music!
However, the warning signs at my agency continued to grow and my workload had diminished significantly. After several phone conversations over two months with the Dallas-based agency, I finally made the decision to take the leap and I started there on March 28, 2011.
curiouslee: I don’t think there is an official policy beyond how Adam Holt conducts business.
1FTEE1425VHC12586
He grew some -
journey...
Now, after you’ve translated that, I’d like to say that I’m not actually there. I really wish I was. Alas… I’m not. I’m here in my little home in Calgary watching the cool refreshing rain fall, the vibrant green grass grow, and the wonderful alluring scent of flowers blooming. It’s just so amazing how, just a few weeks ago, snow was drifting down the sky to our earth and coating everything in a silky white blanket.
“Sure they did, but not...that.”
But soon commuters are pulling over to the side of the road and staring, shocked, at the radio – because you've given no introduction, and no one out there has any idea what this is.
That was, of course, the plan, globalisation and multiculturalism are features of a malevolent alliance between the extremes of two seemingly opposing forces, ruthless capitalism and cultural marxism .
Chin also warned them against undermining party unity and interest.
I've been busy making heaps of cards while I'm on holidays, and decided to enter some into this challenge.
Me- "I can understand that, sir. You can afford a vehicle, I see."
Two years ago, after finishing a fiction MFA in the midst of a great community of writers, I exiled myself southward from Spokane for the sake of gainful, meaningful, student-loan-repaying employment. I landed in a place that turned out to be a fiction desert.
Use the careers guidance in the Careers and Employability Centre (CEC), book an appointment with an advisor, use wikijobs, ask friends, family, the dog – do anything to find out everything about your fields of interest. Once you’ve narrowed it down to a few organisations you’d like to have an internship with, find out if they have a specific internship program. If not, just ask one of our careers advisors and they can talk you through approaching organisations for work experience – here’s the link to book appointments: http://www.as.bham.ac.uk/careers/index.shtml. If your dream organisation does have an application process read on….
Upon seeing herself in the film, Imogen had this to say:
As time passed, I began to wonder if he thought that simply the purchase of the spray would do the trick. The weeds grew taller, he still he hadn’t sprayed, and I was down on my hands and knees pulling out the pesky things. It conjured up memories of my parents years ago. Mom said, “We need a new doorbell.” “OK, Dad replied. “I’ll go to the hardware store in the morning and pick one up.” He purchased a new doorbell, but never installed it. In fact, that was the last we ever heard about it. I had to wonder if the spray my husband bought would have the same fate and end up on a shelf somewhere in the garage never to be found again.
Recently we were all sitting around the supper table, and Nicole was regaling us with tales of her adventures sailing the seven seas, pillaging and plundering as she went. Oh, wait, that never happened. She was actually telling us about a story she had read in the news that day. Now, this is real, but I so wish it was made up. A man had suffered a heart attack while “dining” at the “Heart Attack Grill” in Las Vegas. He was, I’m told, consuming a “Quadruple Bypass Hamburger”.
I've made a list of the anniversaries (the one I have goes up to the 60th - okay, maybe a little optinistic) but I have had to meld the traditional and the modern, as the traditional doesn't cover every single year.
Prior to falling for Mr. Right, I detested onions. I hated the smell, the texture, the taste… all of it! In fact, in my vast array of bland “meat-n-potatoes” recipes, if anything ever called for onion, the most I would throw in would be a very small bit of dried minced onions or onion powder…
There's no point worrying that I can't keep enough in my head to become a novelist and should stick to short stories, even if that's the truth.
When doing anything, remember our attitude may be the key to a successful completion. Our members deserve the best. They are God’s wonderful folks who desire to learn and grow. Your enthusiasm will help to stir within them a joy for learning and help them to grow into the people God planned for them to become.
He wears glasses and YEAH I find guys in glasses extremely hott, I do have a thing for educated, witty and smart gentlemen. No offence to dumb f.u.c.k.wits but I can't have a conversation with someone who is not all there. There's another guy I spotted in the cafeteria (not really a cafeteria, more like a boxed room with a few tables, chairs and two nasty a$$ sofas' that are really hard and not at all comfortable). The guy was reading a huge a$$ book, I was wondering what it was hmm.
Aside from taking some time to line up all the banners and letters it really came together quick and I love that we have two banner punches in MDS!
76. "Take my camel, dear," said my Aunt Dot, as she climbed down from this animal on her return from High Mass. —Rose Macaulay, The Towers of Trebizond (1956)
What does this word mean?
All things considered, this new situation I suddenly find myself in is a vast improvement.
Prince Albert: Then you had better master the rules of the game until you play it better than they can.
This is my first. My first time.
1. Christian Interpretations of Isaiah 53
And he said to them, “Suppose one of you has a friend
Now I had put on face book back that Friday that I was surviving with my husband gone and that it had been a full 3 hours. Somebody got on there and told me they had to go a year and a half while her husband was overseas in the military. Then I started looking over my friends list and discovered that many of my face book friends had to suffer much longer than I with their husbands gone for various reasons. I began to feel very small and silly indeed. The idea of posting how many hours till my husband returned home every 6 to 12 hours of the weekend seemed rather, uh, ridiculous. I really and truly would survive just fine. In fact, I should be thankful that I didn't have to endure what so many other women do. With that I decided to be thankful and get busy. Soon I was cleaning and organizing and packing. Before I knew it, HE CALLED and he was only a few hours from home!! I had made it through the weekend without bawling once, moping around depressed, or even throwing a big hissy fit.
Her pupils dilate, and she leans forward with renewed interest. "Nash, huh?"
For over two centuries, it published the Rural Registers and Almanacs, begun in 1844. The growth of this publication, which included political, socio-economic and scientific information as well as education articles for American pioneers, expanded from the original production of 13,000 copies to 600,000 copies.***
If we do or say something “in the name of the Lord Jesus” it means that we represent Him by what we do or say. What we do or say directly reflects upon Him. Ouch!!
Labour MP for Dagenham Jon Cruddas has already raised the issue of BNP finances in Parliament, and presented the Electoral Commission with a 20-page dossier just before Christmas. Nothing was done! The Electoral Commission usually pass these on to the police if they themselves can not act...
William Goldman–who’s won two Oscars for his screenwriting (Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid and All the President’s Men), and has endeared himself to dentists and their patients planetwide through his novel Marathon Man–has always claimed he merely abridged this text, extracting the “good parts” from an inventive yet wordy classic by Florinese literary superstar, S Morgenstern.
I left the ruins and wandered off into the wilds. After a few hours, I came upon a hagraven battling a troll. Right as I arrived on the scene, the hagraven finished the troll off with a fireball. My first instinct was to run, but I was too close to her and if I turned she would only catch me with one of those deadly spells. I drew my blade and charged in, hoping she was weak and injured from her last fight. She caught me with a bolt of flame right away, and I could smell my own flesh burning. Luckily, my armor absorbed most of the damage, but my sword arm was scorched. I opened with two quick swings across her chest, and I could tell they hurt her in her weakened state. She raked her foul claws over Rajiir’s skin, gouging deep wounds into his fur. This one was beginning to feel very weak. I reached to my belt and quickly downed one of my few healing potions. Feeling much better, I drove my blade at her as hard as I could. The evil creature fell to the ground, her blood spilling out across the snow. I sat there breathing hard, trying to recover from my close brush with death…”
At the core of who I am is the girl that He created. His image. But not everything I have become conforms to that image. So bit by bit, He chips away everything that doesn’t look like Jesus.
The rest of Monday was quite boring. My Mom came down so Monday evening me, Greg and my Mom just sat around in absolute silence, no tv, no nothing, while i did my special breathing continuously. I called Keiko at midnight as the pain was intensifying but unfortunately I was still only 3cm dilated!!! I was sooooo pissed off! I’d been having contractions all day and only three fucking centimetres?!!? (You have to be at 10cm before you can push) So Greg and my Ma went to sleep while I stayed awake with my belly.
“Just give me my wish, bozo.”
As a parent, sick days are pretty much null and void. I mean, sure, if you're lucky enough to have a partner in crime, a phenomenal grandparent or fab friend to take a child off your paws, you can attempt to have some semblance of a sick day but in all reality, you can usually get one good day to really recupe and then, it's back to baby business.
I know all the floorboards that creak when you walk on them.
In the post war years, petrol was also carried down the Trent to a new depot at Colwick further down stream. It was the growth of the combustion engine coupled with the gradual silting up of the Trent at Stoke Bardolph, which was to bring about the end of Trent Lane by the 1980s. Of recent years there have been attempts to regenerate this area with waterside luxury apartments, although with the onset of the credit crunch, the planned demolition of this site appears to have been put on hold. When I was commissioned to do this walk by Hinterland in 2006, it seemed as though this landscape was going to become another symbol of a laissez-faire era dominated by finance and property. Instead, we are now returning to some traditional ideas set deep with the rotting concrete of Trent Lane: social housing and industry.
You were kind to me and a lot of music came out of these walls.
Just in case I had any thoughts of staying in the car and trying to lock him out, he again opened my door once we arrived.
P.S. Tomorrow is Misty's birthday so wish Misty a Happy Birthday ~ Tammmy
As all foreign immigrants tend to do, the Chinese assimilated Indian sensibilities and beliefs. Before you knew it ‘Indian Chinese’ had tickled the taste buds of folk in every small town and city across India.
Punishment varies from a fine or imprisonment of up to one year, or both, and if bodily injury results or if such acts include the use, attempted use, or threatened use of a dangerous weapon, explosives, or fire shall be fined or imprisoned up to ten years or both, and if death results, or if such acts include kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, aggravated sexual abuse or an attempt to commit aggravated sexual abuse, or an attempt to kill, shall be fined under this title, or imprisoned for any term of years or for life, or both, or may be sentenced to death.
MS Punch- Branch
Human rights organisation The Mario Benedetti Foundation gave out its first international human rights award earlier this week. The award was given to Leonard Peltier.
But if I find those wine racks at a yard sale...
Usually when I get a box of nail polish in the mail, I get all giddy and excited. Think five year old with a huge bag of candy happy. When I unwrapped the China Glaze Prismatic Collection, I wasn't quite as thrilled as I usually am. Something just didn't "click".
I have to tell him that Mr Murph got to this picture first with this post from June 2006:
into his neck
Thankfully I didn't have to visit and write about every single venue, but I did submit a significant proportion of reviews as chief contributor. I also had to come up with several themed Top 10 lists - all good fun. Juggling deadlines with a full-time job and blogging was definitely a test of endurance, but like so many things in life, it all came together in the end. It's still rather surreal to see my name on the front cover of a Sydney eating guide!
Since she had her heart set on being a mermaid, I decided to try and make one myself.
4) Identifying who your target audience is
How do they ever come up with -
And while we are on the subject of slime, sleaze and greed… I must draw your attention to an excellent filmed interview by Bruce Carlton on Law.com with ‘three very angry lawyers’: Scott Greenfield, Mark W Bennett and Brian Tannebaum – all serious lawyers, serious bloggers, and users of twitter. The Three Angry Lawyers have had their fill of slimy lawyers using social media to promote their law practices unethically, they have had enough of snake oil, carpet bagging and SEO and other social media mavens. I agree with much of what they say. They have even got stuck into a new phenomenon… ‘GHOST BLOGGERS’. It appears that some lawyers in the States are too dumb to even write their own blogs. It isn’t exactly rocket science to write a blog… but some of these enterprising souls are hiring ‘writers’ to write their blogs for them – ludicrous. The interview is worth watching – although the film took a bit of time to load last night when I watched it.
In the last four issues of the story, the panels are rigidly controlled. Four panels a page for an entire issue. Then three. Two. The issue where Superman dies is entirely made up of splash pages.
Its me again and oops I nearly forgot about posting my candy winnerdidn't I...duh...dont worry if you didn't win this time there will be more candy really soon I promise...so without further delay
New documentary from Nobelprize.org called “Women of Peace”, where the three 2011 Laureates tell their stories. bit.ly/sd9lqU
his father snoring soundly
1/2 lb yellow onions, peeled and sliced 1/2″
(The parcel, also known as Site Five, is part of the Atlantic Yards site and destined for a 25-story building, at least at some point. It is directly adjacent to the Bear's Garden.)
So my plea…if you did click that image with the policeman in, or the countless others on Facebook that serve no actual purpose, how about you make some cakes, sell them to people in your class/office/pub and give the money to a charity? Or, if you are a particularly hairy man (or woman, no sexism here folks) see how many of your friends will quite happily sponsor you to see you in excruciating amounts of pain watching every hair being ripped from its follicle? Or you could set up a standing order to a charity of your choice? Or, if you spend every evening down the pub (and yes, I am taking my own advice here) you could give up one of them and volunteer somewhere,maybe? Do-It is great for finding about the opportunities in your area.
After providing background on her own entry into published writing, Frederick indicated she enjoyed writing for middle graders because they are hungry for stories and retain a sense of wonder and willingness to go along for the ride.
Darkside Fermentation will end its association with the Root Cellar at a second anniversary block party on February 11th. One of the goals of the celebration is to reduce the present stock as much as possible to make way for the Root Cellar's new brewer and new beers.
I don't espouse any particular energy policy, "Carbon Tax", trading arrangement or whatever. I don't know enough about all the particular policies to have serious opinions on them. I'm pretty much in agreement with the "polluter pays" principle, and I accept the reality of "liberal democratic" government. At the same time, while not being simplistically anti-capitalist, I'm aware that capitalism doesn't necessarily well serve the general good. I know that national governments aren't world governments, but they are governments in the world.
in is a mirror reflecting how we view ourselves (ie)
Pretorius, speaking from the Emfuleni Medi-Clinic in Vanderbijlpark, said on Monday evening that since the attack almost six days ago, police had not interviewed him about what had happened.
Just magic.
So, the next morning we headed out to check out part of the Natchez Trace. I have wanted to check it out ever since reading about quite a few years ago. It’s a modern road today, but it first began as an animal trail. It later became an Indian footpath that linked tribes in a large region between what is today Natchez, Mississippi and Nashville, Tennessee. There are still come places where you can see parts of the original Trace. It’s pretty cool to think of all the feet over time that have traveled along the path.
Anyyyyywaaaay - so far we've looked at lots of ways one might choose a significator - some complicated and others very simple.
Now the weight of gold that came to Solomon in one year was
It is our 3 week break here, so I’ve been just chilling, really. My flat mates are gone, and with them their amazing kitchen mess making abilities, so I’ve been actually cooking!
Source:泷爱在在+ 金家四少的爱+ Red_Sense @baidu
What do you call candles that have been crafted with passion and perfection by the same family for five generations and more than 140 years? What do you call candles that use the purest beeswax, an all-natural color palette and sophisticated, essential oil fragrances? What do you call candles that are consistently flawless, cleaner burning, longer lasting and elegantly designed? What do you call the best candle in America, made in America? If you call them Root Candles… you’d be right.
Bonang Mohale, chairman of Shell South Africa, said, “The risks to the environment are well understood, well articulated and I think they can be totally and utterly mitigated, especially the issues of water contamination, the aquifers, and the scarcity of water.” The company also assures residents of surrounding areas that drilling will give their towns an economic boost.
The Missal of Paul III gives a simple abbreviated version “I confess to Almighty God, Blessed Mary ever-Virgin, Blessed Peter and all the saints and you brethren, that I have sinned through my fault. I beseech you, pray for me.”
With the Smell of New Rain.
It's all read and ready to pass on.
AdriN2001: Yeah it's perfect
CR: It may seem an obvious reply, and it is open-hearted instead. I am really happy to play with this team. We work hard during rehearsals, but always with the right mix of play, fun and laugh. This helps the artistic outcome in a very positive way. With them it is possible to explore the infinite nuances of interpretation – which rises from the common wish to well accomplish a work we love and try to make it interesting. With Breslik, my partner on stage, I have a special musical and theatrical feeling.
Oakshire Brewing: La Ferme = C+ (I only tasted potential greatness... need age. Read my notes)
Just, Universe, please- our mother deserves to be angry and work through this and find hope and a constructive path- just please let it be well-timed and good. Please let this fire bake us all into good bread and, most important of all, don't let my sister fall in.
Soon-to-be-victim: ‘You’re an evil man, Baron Frankenstein! I have proof and I’m going to the police about it!’
BOX OFFICE PERFORMANCE: $636,706 on a $2M production budget; even with no budget at all it lost money.
You'll have a more honest government, a government that isn't meddling in people's lives with tax policy voodoo. You won't be subsidizing crime: hijacking, theft, smuggling. And you won't look stupid when the inevitable happens.
“Excuse me,” they say, cheeks reddening a bit.
Additonally, transgenderism has nothing to do with sexual orientation.
(1 John 3:1 (NIV))
for her Christmas stocking.
In Mark’s gospel today, Jesus has given us the parable of the sower, the seed, and the believer. Christ sets out four types of listeners. The first is the listener who hears the Word, Satan takes it away from them and there is never an opportunity for the seed to take any kind of root. The second is the listener who receives the Word with joy, but the seed has been planted in a rocky place where it does not take root, and the listener quickly falls away from belief in times of trouble. The third type of listener hears the Word, but the seed is among thorns, and because of deceitfulness of wealth, worries, and lusts, the listener falls away over time. The fourth type of listener hears the Word, it is planted deep in good soil, and the listener responds in joy and perseverance, resulting in an abundance of good fruit. In the order of the world according to man, we might read this parable and conclude that man must prepare in himself good soil and make sure that the seeds are planted where they need to be, so that man might reap the full measure of his investment. In the order of the world according to God, we might read this parable and understand that God is the Word, He formed the soil, He has placed us where He wants us (whether it be out in the open, on the rocks, in the thorns, or growing in the good soil), and the outcome is in His hands. In the order of man, we understand salvation to be dependent upon how good our soil is. In the order of God, we understand salvation to be dependent upon how good God is.
**We lost sight our mores, our sense of local, state and national responsibility;
I hold no brief for the five men accused of murdering Stephen Lawrence, they may well be guilty, and they certainly do not seem very pleasant people. However, under British law being unpleasant is not evidence of guilt. Various trials and a private prosecution have failed to achieve a conviction and, even though the government gone so far as to abandon the double jeopardy protection we have had since Magna Carter (almost certainly with this case in mind) the verdict of racially motivated homicide remains nothing more that an allegation.
A few springs of Thyme. I just learn't this. Thyme is the subtler variety of ajwain. So you can use Ajwain leaves for this one, just go very low ( a few leaves at most)
So anyhow, this brings me back to TUESDAY'S POST. I stand by my words, as it is truly what's been on my heart, but I can't help but feel like I owe you an apology for possibly leaving you with a heavy or burdened heart. I in no way was trying to be a spirit squelcher, or put anyone down in any way. It takes a lot of love and energy to create homes that are beautiful, inspiring, resourceful, and running smoothly. We all know that it is not about the "stuff." Our world is saturated with images and expectations that challenge that very statement though. It's a constant battle.
“Wow. They have reached the politicians’ level of entitlement, she thinks she is entitled to retire at 47? Holy smokes. I don’t know what more to say to that. A government employee thinking that 47 is a reasonable expectation to retire shows just how deep inside their own bubble they live, insulated from the real world.”
The winner of the blog candy is........
Why do you suppose it was the Levites who sided with Moses? (I believe the Levites sided with Moses because he was of their tribe. It would be nice to think it was the righteousness of the cause, but I don’t think the Levites were any more righteous (nor less culpable) than any of the other tribes.)
There are also outstanding wiliness shows in the state that leave helpfulness you with the direct that you require to pee and commit as gifts. The Carol Duvall simulation for happening has a lot of projects that you can do to hit it easier for you. It module also have you up to companion with whatsoever of the materials and gadgets (yes crafters bonk gadgets) that testament alter everything much easier to do. There are the knife machines, the stamps and the engravers. Certainty me, making handstitched gifts has never been easier with all these gadgets.
I remember once seeing a sticker plastered on the back bumper of a car that had just cut me off as I was driving in traffic in New York City. The bumper sticker said, “Christians Aren’t Perfect! But They Are Forgiven!” And therein lies the million dollar answer to the issue of hindsight! We are human. We will make mistakes. It is the very human part that we might wish we did not have….but alas, that was not the plan during the time when the blueprint for man was being mapped by the Almighty! However, the even bigger piece is the word “FORGIVEN”, and it is thanks to Him that we have been gifted with this. After all, as Christians do we not seek to live our lives following the model given to us by Christ? And, was not that hope of forgiveness His gift to us by making the supreme sacrifice that He did? Because of His sacrifice we each have been gifted with the hope for salvation, despite the fact that our mistakes might just make that hope seem to be unlikely option! But only when we confess our sins in all earnestness…..only then!
hard
Mati: I do not really understand what this means. I know, from Jess, that hinds like to accumulate possessions. This means nothing in the world of cats. If I have a warm, safe bed in the catacombs, and my friends around me, I am rich in spirit.
A few things always happen though during our blessing prayer. Abby never closes her eyes - she wants to watch all of us as we recite after Thomas and she is usually smiling ear to ear. For the life of us, Brian and I always have to hold back a huge giggle when Thomas gets to the part "bless this food to our bodies"... I think in large because it's so formal for a 4-year old to say... and it reminds me of my Catholic upbringing. The last thing that always happens is Abby has now insisted on saying a blessing prayer of her own after Thomas is done. Hers is short & sweet. But most importantly, its her time to say what she wants as we give thanks. With our hands still together and all of us looking at Abby, she let's out a very definitive and confident, "AMEN!"﻿
Every fall, Chief Lightfoot would adorn his full traditional garb and dance each Saturday afternoon. People would come from all over the world to watch and enjoy. His legacy is remembered in Foggy Noggin’s Irish Red Ale. The reddish hue brings this quaffable ale to your attention, the smooth, rich, rounded malty back-bone warms your senses, and the hint of dry bitterness in the finish makes you wish you had another pint. I am Indian, I dance. This is my dance.
Heliophiles are jumping for joy. The 3D stereo images arrived just in time to document new coronal holes forming on the sun’s far side, which are heading to face towards us.
Place plums in a blender. Make a puree. Add sugar and blend it well. Pass the mixture through a sieve and strain. Collect the plum juice.
Look, I know people do this all the time, completely by themselves, and I consider myself to be very fortunate that I do have such an awesome hubby who really does every thing in his power to come home on time... that being said, holy crap can this week just be over?
2. BEAUTIFUL SHOW in Germany
Anyway, there is one less miniature dachshund in the world today after an Illinois woman had hers put down because it ate her big toe while she was asleep. Roscoe, the dog, was euthanized because of safety concerns when the woman awoke after a nap on Monday to find her big toe missing. The 56 year old diabetic had no nerve feeling in her toes and slept soundly while Roscoe nibbled away. The dog it seems had been attracted to the toe which had been bandaged due to a healing hangnail.
Mollie Jo & Bobo
I already know that Ashley will not be asked to the prom. Yes, her teachers and I may be able to 'arrange' something, but that's not what I want for her. I want a real date with a handsome young man who truly wants to accompany Ashley to the dance. Or, I want someone special, someone who will make everyone else sit up and take notice, to agree to go to the dance with Ashley.
The entire time I read, I kept waiting for something...more. If you asked me, I couldn't tell you what it was. Just felt like I wanted more. And Jenna's relationship with her spiritual mentor set off red flags all over the place for me. As a wife of a pastor, that is a no-no, no matter how many boundaries are in place. Maybe that was the deciding factor for me liking the book.
“When you say that the girl uses the ‘C’ word do you mean she says ’see – you – enn – tea’ ?” she asked me, scarcely believing that Eurostar was breaking new ground in high speed advertising.
For more information visit www.propertyguru.com.sgand register for our daily news email to be kept up-to-date on forthcoming events.
I remember being and feeling so freeeeeeee. I no longer saw every single non-married guy in my life as a potential boyfriend (that’s right, no more checking out CTU). I also praise God for protecting me from any more unnecessary emotional turmoils with the ex. He was texting me from out of nowhere. And although I am very happy being single and have in many ways “moved on” in my life, I’ve come to realize how I’m still so incredibly drawn to him. One casual text and I’m already thinking that maybe he wants to pursue me again. Ha. If I’m in such a great place in my life and am still so vulnerable, my heart breaks all the more and worries for all those who are grieving over broken relationships.
The ABC's of the Economic Crisis- Fred Magdoff and Michael D. Yates (s)
One of my favorite new-to-me antiques is this blue and white coverlet. I've always admired woven coverlets like this, but authentic early ones in good condition are few and far between, not to mention expensive. But on our Thanksgiving road trip a couple weeks ago, we took a minor detour to stop at one of my favorite antique malls in Shipshewana, Indiana, and I spotted this beautiful blanket almost the moment I walked in the door. It was in excellent condition, and I flipped over the price tag without much hope. But at $80 it was literally hundreds less than I was expecting, so I bought myself an early Christmas present. (There, see, I have done a little shopping after all).
* csh path variable. If the module isn’t found in the first directory
I have to confess, I’m looking around, and I’m not really getting that impression.”
I found out about this from more alert members of The Readership. (Man. You guys are working overtime these days!) I also found out the identities of more individuals included in The Readership. Which was pretty cool. Finding out I had been hacked, however, was not. Finding out the hacking involved my blog linking to unsavoury, exploitative sites was even less so. Some of my friends described what was happening when they tried to read the post about my mother (really? This had to happen with a post about my mother??), and others discussed that apparently this is a problem for which WordPress is (recently?) notorious.
Cooke, M., The Chronicle of Jazz, Thames and Hudson Ltd, London, 1997.
I know everyone is facebooking and tweeting about Obama’s support for gay marriage, but I thought I would add my voice to the chorus. The political climate now is incredibly polarized and drowning with sounds of fundamentalist christian rhetoric. For non-fundamentalists and progressives, the times are especially fraught with uncertainty and seeming irrationality.
Allie Gower
The three younger men looked at each other and then back at Pete.
I had planned to make the cones and display them in the tub, but then I realized that wrapping them in cello bags would make them much more portable and far more sanitary.
I begin by drinking lots of coffee. Then I write until my back aches. I can go for many, many hours. But I don’t write every day. In fact, I can go weeks without writing. But, the story, or poem, is always there circling. I am always “writing” in a way, filtering the world through the project I am at. So, when I do sit down, I am ready to strike.
I used Simply Soft, which is my favorite acrylic yarn to work with. To me it feels like cotton. Not cotton yarn, but cotton batts or balls. Does anyone remember back when Johnson & Johnson made those sterile cotton rolls that came in the blue box? Ours never stayed sterile for long as I was always opening the box and petting it when my Mom wasn't looking.
The second and most important question is the future of the strategic gap. Although connected to the BHA application, it is a separate issue and as such should be decided entirely separately to the BHA application. The right and proper place for any decision about the future of the strategic gap is during public consultations of the new Local Development Framework (LDF). This new draft Local Plan is due for public consultation in a few weeks’ time and would then be adopted in 2013 /14.
Is there a reason why kids just can't come knowing how to sleep, how to poop in the toilet and with a full set of teeth, I mean the whole teething thing sucks too...don't even get me started on that bull shit.
Most of these pilots will probably defect.
Romans 12:1-2
So I feel so much pain for his suffering. I empathize with his struggle and I’ve seen the severe impacts his disability has had on him. Even the doctors say alcohol is one of very few paths for relief for him. And if my husband were able to drink without being a drunk I would have no issue with it. I’ve lived with it for 15 years now, though, and his alcoholism has shaped me into a bitter, mistrustful shrew of a woman. I cannot stand this person I’ve become and I simply refuse to live the next 15 years of my life this way.
So the question remains--how does London’s greatest wit turn into Eygalières' village idiot and, perhaps more importantly, why was he so self-delusional in the first place?
An’ hunger fer ‘em somehow, with ‘em allus on yer mind.
On the basis of scientific evidence, I am totally willing to concede that the universe in fact has a beginning. That particular premise of the cosmological argument is true. I spent all that time arguing about infinities not because I believe the universe has no beginning, but because I genuinely believe WLC has infinities all wrong.
In the meantime, I hope the spirit of the holiday season finds you and immerses itself deep in your soul right through into next year.
The trailer and the truck were returned to the owners and the tires were secured at the property compound.
We really enjoy reading your posts each week! Featured post bloggers, please grab the badge above and display it on your site! Link it to one of the host blogs' posts for the specific week that you were featured.
Oh Dear God, I’ve become my mother….
That she seems to concede. The media never picked this up and, when it was brought to their attention, never commented on it. This tells you two things: First, moral outrage is not some uncontrollable force, it is a conscious decision. And, second, the media is capable of reasoned judgement too because it makes much sense to hold your tongue when your entire case has been pulled from under you by the poster child for your cause.
But I think the most important way I advocate for Natural Parenting is by living as a Natural Parent. Not everyone knows about or is initially attracted to Natural Parenting. But sometimes all it takes is to see another parent doing something to spark interest. I can't count the times I've been asked about living local, using eco-friendly products, cloth diapers, babywearing or cosleeping. Once that spark is ignited it very rarely goes out. The more we learn, the more educated and informed we become, the more we realize we have a choice. We don't have to be the parent a magazine, book, mother or friend says we do. We can choose to be the parent our heart tells us to be. And one parent at a time I believe our world will continue to change for the better.
use concrete examples
C. Inability to recall important personal information that is too extensive to be explained by ordinary forgetfulness;
Today is the day for sorting it all out. There are those who have probably had their children's uniforms pressed, their spanking new shoes polished and their bookbags primed with new stationary since the second day of the holidays. But not me. I have learned that being too organised too early makes one complacent. Things get forgotten. More importantly - children grow. They shoot up during the summer holidays like little sprouting beanstalks. They may have some recessive giant genes.
I went to help out at my sister-in-law’s lunch room and then we went to party at Terug naar Toen (Back to Then) where they only played hits from the past 20 years. So much fun!
At bedtime, we read together, and then it was time for lights out. We said our goodnights, and I went to my room to read. Then softly, from the other side of the house, I heard faint whimpers that quickly turned into epic sobs. When I went to check on her, she was crying so hard she couldn't catch her breath to tell me what was wrong. But I already knew.
It’s a rare person indeed who is born into the precise role their consciousness is best suited to. Most are fortunate just to arrive within “the ballpark” of where they need to be. For some however, getting to their “comfort zone” requires an arduous and painful journey along a very dark and lonely road. But even they can complete their journey if they’re willing to recognize, and accept, the help they need along the way.
1/2 cup vegetable oil
However, post-Mubarak Egypt — ruled by the Muslim Brotherhood — exactly meets the required criteria. For that reason we are now hearing calls for the full implementation in Egypt of the shari’ah, including hudud, by leading figures in the new Salafist coalition.
1 end's
This is a very old self portrait (2008) of me trying to practice with a reflector towards the end of the day, you can see how a reflector helps, while its not perfect, it is much better, the light is less harsh. The aim of the reflector was to get enough sun on the shadow side of my face to match the side with the sun.
COLLEGE DOESN’T GUARANTEE YOU A JOB NOR IS JOB TRAINING THE ORIGINAL INTENDED PURPOSE OF COLLEGE!
"Stand yerself up girl, and whatever you do, don't take no deep breaths, that won't do yer no good in here"
1.Bar B-Q
Asíde from the usual enormous pleasure you get from an Andre Kostelanetz album, there are some fun and games built in here, along with the sheer beauty of sweeping strings and rich orchestration.
Christmas songs sung: 13
Does Pop Rap amount to nothing more than a culture of D.I.Y. Drug distribution, where "Knowledge of Self " becomes a "Self first" attitude? Where Mc's become Gun-slingers and the Almighty Dollar is God, a Hip-Hop Men only jail bait club, perpetual sinners, Hypocrites drapped in Diamond encrusted Platinum Crosses and "Jesus Pieces".
On the grassroots level, The Recovery Project will work with local organizations to help them create their own awareness events. A&E will continue to co-host, along with the PDFA, and leading MSOs such as Time Warner Cable, Cox and Comcast, Intervention Town Hall meetings in cities across the country.
Like a lot of people, I can track back to the first time NASCAR truly peaked my interest – it was February 18, 1979, maybe the most famous day in NASCAR history. In the first NASCAR race ever televised flag to flag by a major network (CBS, as part of the CBS Sports Spectacular franchise), Cale Yarborough and Donnie Allison fought for the lead of the Daytona 500 all the way down the backstretch of the last lap, crashed and then fought in the infield. This was unheard of in IndyCar racing, at least that they televised. Even A.J. Foyt didn’t start punching guys until 1997.
Lonely in this world of happy zombies, Marsh and Elyse fall into an intense relationship...but the secrets they uncover could be the death of this growing love—and the death of everyone, and everything, they love in Summer Falls.
And last but not least two 1:48th scale GAZ AA. These are UM-Models and were quiet horrible to build. Very brittle plastic and lots of flimsy parts. Surprising enough, they are quiet robust once assembled and stand up to the rigors of gameplay. Tomorrow shall either be the tanks or infantry (I have not decided yet).
The couple supplied the victim with a gas can and a gallon of gas, according to a Manatee County Sheriff’s Office report.
I wish I was sitting on these Parisian chairs as I wait to resolve my technical issues in transferring to the new French Essence site...
The stainless-steel is a nasty harsh, cold substance. Alas, gold and silver are too soft and malleable for this sort of mechanism. The squared edges could do with radiusing too. The makers describe it as having six precision gears. I'd quibble, and say a precision gear-maker would perhaps call those semi-precision. A little bit of dirt, goo, or grit might be a big problem. The model in the videos has hairy fingers. I winced at the thought, even though my fingers are not hairy, and no, I do not shave them, nor do I have them waxed.
I am not saying that the images then were better than now, but that they have changed quite a bit over time. I think that technically, I could do this again, but I am not sure I'd have the mind set for it right now.
I looked down the beach and scowled at the slide in camper that our family, along with a Pomeranian and a red Doberman, had lived in on the beach for a full year. My Doberman lay beside my feet acting lethargic and panting. I reached over and scratched behind her ears as I stared at the pale, cloudless sky. When we first arrived I’d loved the idea of living at a beach and looked forward to swimming in the ocean at any given time I chose.
I mean seriously...
My favorite phrase today is hard work. N., when you break out in perspicacity. Def.: Hard work pays off in the future. Laziness pays off now.
You'll notice in Jaxon's pictures he has a red spot on his lip. This is called a strawberry hemangioma. It's considered a "tumor" but really it's just a build up of blood vessels under the skin. This spot on him will continue to get darker and bigger until about age 3-5. By then the doctor's said it will shrink down and start to fade away. This is the best case scenario though. I made the mistake of Googling pictures of it online and found myself horrified. I have read that it can be removed with a laser, but doctors don't like to do that unless it's posing a breathing or vision problem. Babies can be born with them anywhere on their bodies. We didn't notice Jaxon's until he was about two weeks old and it has grown a little since then and gotten a little darker. I hope and pray that it goes away in time, but even if it doesn't he is still a beautiful boy!!
This is the most basic movement in aikido. In fact, it is the first to be taught. Ikkyo makes use of control in the grip by applying hand grip on the elbow and near the wrist. The grip can apply pressure on the ulnar, a medial portion of the arm.
People also find it surprising that it took me so long to knock this off the list. After all, I go out for drinks quite a bit. I frequent cocktail bars, and an Old Fashioned isn’t an obscure drink. When it comes to my list though, I have many lovely friends who see it and immediately put claims down on some of the things. So I’ve held out on a lot, saving them for certain people, certain times of year, certain events. But time’s a-wastin’, and I have a pretty hefty list on my hands.
I wish to remember this simple day.
We enter the building via a modern annexe, though, in which the kitchen has been converted into a temporary bar. When we get to the front of the queue to the serving hatch it takes a lot of willpower to resist the temptation to ask the barman for two glasses of the blood of Christ. You might expect the parishoners overseeing proceedings to look on the procession of lank-haired ATP types filing into the church with all the disdain of a houseproud person watching a visitor carelessly treading dogshit into their carpet - but no, they welcome us with genuine warmth.
For now is the time I shall redeem.
What causes stress depends, at least in part, on your perception of it. Something that’s stressful to you may not faze someone else; they may even enjoy it. For example, your morning commute may make you anxious and tense because you worry that traffic will make you late. Others, however, may find the trip relaxing because they allow more than enough time and enjoy listening to music while they drive.
I'm too lazy to make it, and the fluffy white frosting by Betty Crocker is really, really good. But memories of that frosting . . . I just might have to give it a try.
Austin stopped by for a visit and tour of the garden, on his way south. He's not been here before and we enjoyed getting to visit. He's off on an adventure, hoping to learn about oyster and shrimp harvesting off the coast of Florida for the next month or two. He doesn't have any contacts there, just plans to head to the coast and offer his labor in exchange for learning how oysters are harvested. We told him we expect good stories when he comes back.
Now just state why you’re saying thank you:
Lynne McTaggart is more scientifically minded and her books are full of quoted research, in case you are looking for the science connection. Her book, The Intention Experiment, contains both instructions for effective intention setting and research to show measured results.
Then I piped the turkey's body out of chocolate cream cheese frosting. I added candy corn for the feathers, and an M&M for the face (I originally tried using Whoppers, but the eye balls didn't stand out enough). I dotted the eyes with an edible food writer, added an orange rainbow chip for the beak, and an upside-down heart confetti for the wattle.
While catching up with reading some back issues of New Scientist magazine today I came across another story about a criminal conviction that resulted from some very sharp soft-furnishing fabric design recognition skills on the part of an American law-enforcement officer. It’s not a nice story, not nice at all, but at least there’s some inspiration to be found in the good people using technology to fight the vile crime of child sexual abuse. An investigator at the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children noticed that among the countless horrible images received at the NCMEC two were of girls of a similar age on what looked like the same bedspread of a distinctive appearance. I have no idea how the police trace these things, but the locations where that style of bedspread were sold were identified, and this was the clue that led to the identification of the children and the criminal. Google have developed for the NCMEC software designed to achieve similar feats of visual object recognition as the investigator’s human visual recognition of the bedspread. It is hoped that the automation of the identification of items of interior decoration in images of child abuse will help to solve more crimes. Of course, the NCMEC also works to identify the child victims of crime themselves, in the Child Victim Identification Program. Google, Yahoo and Microsoft are partners in the NCMEC’s Technology Coalition, and the application of technology to the task of identification is viewed as the only way to deal with the increasing volume of pornographic material submitted to the NCMEC every year.
I've been thinking about RENT, and how you feel, and how I feel, and how other people feel, and I've come to some conclusions. The first is that I don't really like it. As a person who likes musicals, theatre, rock music, and opera; and having heard (read: been forced to listen to) entire broadway recordings a considerable amount; on a strictly musical and musical-theatre level, I dont think it's great. It uses the opera format to get out of having to write decent dialogue; it uses the rock music format to get out of having to write real melodies; and it uses the musical-theatre format to avoid the density of material required by a dramatic play about the same subject matter.
Simon & Garfunkel Bridge over troubled water US
style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;lt&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;goog&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;lt&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;&amp;amp;&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;lt&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;;/span&amp;gt;;center&amp;gt;&amp;amp;&amp;amp;&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;lt&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;goog&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;lt&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;&amp;amp;&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;lt&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;;/span&amp;gt;;a &amp;amp;&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;lt&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;goog&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;" class="goog-spellcheck-word"&amp;gt;href&amp;lt;/span&amp;gt;&amp;amp;&amp;lt;span style="background: none repeat scroll 0% 0% yellow;"
But nearly ten years later, I still haven't forgotten.
Anyway, here's a track listing for "Ambiguous Reality." I'd love to hear your comments about the songs:
24x12" oil on stretched canvas copyright 2012 $350
(or one can read some earlier posts on this blog, as well as those in our Blogroll on the right)
Give your fairies a home.
We will do it with or without you, US tells Pakistan
Trying so hard not to laugh at Shu. I feel you man, I feel you.
Unfortunately my nothing to say is not poetry. I've been feeling pretty weary over the last few weeks, it's been enough to keep up with daily life. So although I'm a bit more back to normal now I've still no new poems to work on. I did get a poem acceptance email from Gutter Magazine a few day ago which I'm really happy about, Gutter is one of my favourite literary mags.
Everyone at school griped about how boring fishing was, during free time in class. When we first moved here I loved fishing. It let me relax and forget everything. I used to enjoy crab meat too. Since moving here I’d grown tired of most seafood.
I’m inspired either way.
BM: And he was so constantly overlooked due to political reasons. He really should have been given a higher rank because his decisions were always the good ones.
I’ve been familiar with Chris Verene’s photographs since I started graduate school at the School of Visual Arts in 2006. Chris was a critique teacher there, and although I never had the chance to study with him I was always curious about his highly saturated, unsettling and poignant images of his extended family. Chris has been photographing his relatives in Galesburg, Illinois for 26 years. His approach to depicting his family is tender and humorous and often disturbing. His style is distinctive; marked by his use of fill flash, a square film format and the addition of neatly handlettered text surrounding the image.
Thanks for stopping by Today! Scrap those memories before they fade away!
Racists must be destroyed, they must be purged, and it is for those in power to determine and redefine what racism is.
saw it that I slowed a little and we kept our eyes on it. But as we came
Greek Poppers with Tzatziki
Taking the old man’s arm, he pushed him away.
General discussion
My esteemed colleague (yes, another), Neko-chan, who was with me at the time, and I immediately formulated a set of guidelines - nay, dictates - for publishers to follow when describing their products, in order to avoid such heinous confusion in future. Here they are:
The blooms are as large as my hand
"Oh, GROSS!" Jeffrey yells, scrambling to his feet.
About Anne:
The art style mimics comics from the fifties/sixties. Though it starts out a little shaky, it really embraces that retro style in Chapter 10, when the artist begins “aging” the pages so that they look like “something you found in your grandparents’ attic.
It is so tempting to walk away from it all.
- Both have mastered nuclear technology.
*I sprinkled dairy-free chocolate chips on top once it was pressed in to shape. This way they don’t melt!*
It's time for Avid Baker's Challenge monthly bake! For this month, it is Big Batch Scones taken from The Weekend Baker, by Abigail Johnson Dodge, the book that ABC is currently baking from. For this recipe, Abby has given a couple of flavour variations for you to choose from. One of the flavour is chocolate chopped to small bits, I use choc chips instead, I never did like to cut up chocolates!
In summary, you've got the makings of what is obviously an awesome story here. Even through some of the issues with the query, I can tell there is an exciting and moving tale underneath. What you need to focus on is tightening this letter until you can get the three main points of every story across: Character, Conflict, Choice.
when we saw that we had about 45 minutes to wait for our train, we decided rather than waiting in the station, we'd sit at a nearby cafe.
I have been looking forward to this hop...but not for any other reason than the fact that I got my hands on the most perfect book to use as a giveaway....
the U.S. ground troops were
We’re almost out of Oklahoma…
See, this list isn't about good movies. Whatever you think about this Cameron Crowe remake, this fantasy sequence featuring Tom Cruise in a completely empty Times Square is remarkable by merits of them pulling it off at all.
Each living inch of you was miracle,
In view of the evidences uncovered so far we call upon the authorities ie the Election Commission and the MACC to investigate vote buying incidents and also the extent of the abuse of public fund for the campaign of all the candidates for the 10th Sarawak state elections. If the authorities fail to act-as most people don’t expect them to, then the last resort in a democracy is for the voters to use the voting power in their hand to reject all vote buying candidates in the coming General Elections. We give 2 week for the authorities to commence action-failing which we would initiate a nation-wide campaign to mobilize voters to reject all candidates who try to buy votes in the coming General Elections, more so on those who would not stop at stealing public fund to do so!
and one of the things they want is porn they can enjoy. i can't count how many chickens have asked me where they can obtain porn for women, porn that's as sexy and hardcore and depicts real fucking, without the scum factor.
I’ve told this story to many of my friends who are professional clergy. They usually get a kick out of it—in part because they accept it a generalized truism. So much of the faith discourse, while perhaps good and even spot on, is often devoid of practical impact. It’s not only Christianity, or religion, that gets targeted by this critique—most academic or philosophic movements struggle to have real grounded applications. This is no more relevant than when it comes to the topic of being changed—of being transformed.
If you notice above, I've finally succumbed to Pinterest and oh.em.gee...what a time suck. But I'm loving it....it's making me a crazed thrifter. Seriously...it's a little outta hand. AND, I started a Facebook page last night. I'm not sure what's gotten into me. I can't figure out how to get the FB icon on my blog though...so you're safe for now ;) Stay tuned for more fun!
1. Yesterdays
Everything went very well over Christmas - presents were opened, The Boy's dinner was superb, and Mr A and I could sit on the sofa reading while he did all the work. The fare included my turkey farm freebie, which turned out to be a Three Bird Roast - a hunk of meat as thick as your arm comprising a (boned) guinea fowl within a duck within a turkey, with stuffing down the middle. The three of us got through about a third of it, and a week later Mr A and I still have some left. Very tasty, although I wouldn't be able to distinguish the three bird flavours; it might as well have been all turkey.
The occupant is a small nuclear family, consisting of the couple, 2 pre-school kids and a domestic helper. Thus, the decision to retain the main structure is made.
This week Sporting KC contining their perfect start to the season with a home defeat of RSL, and LA Galaxy managed a 3-1 result against Portland but remain in the drop zone with those same Timbers.
Heading home the other day I picked up a girl who works in one of the children's hospitals, she was working in South Africa before this and her partner wanted to come and work in Europe, so they quickly married so he could get a green card and work in Europe.
So as most of you know, I was sick sick sick s few nights ago. I had food poisoning. Thankfully, Ty got my mom on the phone and she talked us through it. A few hours later I was asleep in bed, with only a few more runs to the bathroom. Also, I was about 7 pounds lighter. Yech. I sincerely hope I never have to go through that again, but it did have a positive side effect.
He is not the only one who is tired of what he thinks is the Leftist bias of the BBC. Michael Gove, a Conservative MP, and political commentator Mark Dooley complain about lopsided coverage of certain issues: “Take, for example, the BBC’s coverage of the late Yasser Arafat. In one profile broadcast in 2002, he was lauded as an “icon” and a “hero,” but no mention was made of his terror squads, corruption, or his brutal suppression of dissident Palestinians. Similarly, when Israel assassinated the spiritual leader of Hamas, Sheikh Ahmed Yassin, in 2004, one BBC reporter described him as “polite, charming and witty, a deeply religious man.” This despite the fact that under Yassin’s guidance, Hamas murdered hundreds.” “A soft left worldview influences too much of what the corporation produces. We have a right to expect more honesty from the broadcasting service we are being asked to pay for.”
So, there you go. Next First Contact Day, do what I always tell other people to do: Grab yourself the first Vulcan (or other non-terrestrial biological entity) you meet, wiggle to the left, wiggle to the right, and do the Ooby Dooby with all of your might…all while living long and prospering in forthright, logical fashion, of course.
Thurs 5.30pm, my mind wandering and filled with excitement and anticipation of the coming EU elections, I’m suddenly jerked back to reality by the familiar tone of Nick Griffin singing “Brand new leather jacket” on my mobile and it signals a call from a fellow patriot and BNP member. “can you make it this weekend we have some work to do?”
It has been four years since I started this blog, and it is time to freshen things up. I am in the process of starting up a new blog with a running, cooking, and food focus (which mine kinda was already - I just wanted to give it a new look and theme that will reflect this!).
Rachel showed me a bizarre video she took in Rochester a couple weeks ago. She and friends were driving back to their home when thousands of crows descended on the city. Almost like something out of the movie The Birds except these seemed maybe a little friendlier.
Women who lost their virginity as young teenagers are more likely to divorce – especially if it was unwanted, according to new research.
14) Jean Is Dead
SRS raw scores are commonly used in research, but the SRS has also been standardized, providing T-scores which account for variables such as gender and differences between raters (e.g. parents vs teachers). T-scores are standard scores with a mean of 50 and a standard deviation of 10.
Sooo, I asked Goldie, "Who has the same dress and wore it to Children's Hour?"
This morning was a pretty good day in my house. My son was calm and didn't need to be held every second and I had some time to put together a card. I was able to cut out a whole bunch of pieces to different things so that I could just piece them together and not have to take the time to cut them out. So far 1 step at a time has been good!!
Once again it uses the DSP which is one of four which are featured in April's special offer.
Nice Smile’s Myspace page is so Spartan and sporadically updated that it hardly qualifies as a web presence. Where the first thing most bands do nowadays is start a Bandcamp and Facebook page, seed certain music blogs with sample tracks, and sell their songs online, Vasquez’s music seems as inaccessible as it was in the pre-mp3 era. The issue of its invisibility is less the result of a disinterested public and more the result of his apathetic approach to self-promotion. From Gorls to The Chintz Devils to Right On, he’s never heavily promoted any of his bands.
LIMA, Peru (AP) — Peruvian authorities say they are struggling to keep outsiders away from a clan of previously isolated Amazon Indians who began appearing on the banks of a jungle river popular with environmental tourists last year.
This is a big, bold move by PayPal. It represents a watershed decision that protects the rights of writers to write, publish and distribute legal fiction. It also protects the rights of readers to purchase and enjoy all fiction in the privacy of their own imagination. It clarifies and rationalizes the role of financial services providers and pulls them out of the business of censoring legal fiction.
DW: Why the hell haven’t they made this public already?
And no, Monumental’s not afraid of Old One; that’s just an Insane sim idle animation.
I did not winter well in London. We stayed in a London University hostel near Paddington station and I would travel most days either by bus to Senate House or by tube to the British Library near Kings Cross. I soon discovered that the pollution on the tube was creating havoc with my lungs, so much so that at times I was struggling to mount the stairs from the underground to Euston Road and complete the short walk along to the Library. Then, on a crisp December day with the temperature near zero, I ground to a complete halt on a walk along the Grand Union Canal and we had to find a bus to return us to our bedsit in Paddington.
(Oops, wait - cut the atmosphere. Remember, no real names, no actual pictures of the client, the babe, details changed, etc, etc.... c'mon now, folks! Protecting privacy here :) Okay, rewind back to that warm, cozy story-in-front-of-the-roaring-fire-again... where were we?)
Kegged: 01-22-2009
OF CONTENTS1
How was it working with Barbra Streisand?
their biggest selling album to date.
Of course, I have to share another couple of books that I hold dear in my heart. Stephanie Nielson's book Heaven is Here is a book I devoured in a couple of days.
2. The Time Traveler’s Wife
A meeting of minds and the making of Duffer
Afraid that when I open my eyes you will be
1 Tb vanilla extract
Now compare these heroic stands of the human spirit with the regular, rancid portrayals in the media of misbehaving actors, actresses, and professional athletes. There isn’t even a semblance of balance between informing the moral and voyeuristic instincts of their readers and viewers.
FINGEROTH: Was it your idea to try to get the
MERRY CHRISTMAS II YOU is Mariah Carey’s 13th studio album, and follows up her worldwide multi-million-selling Memoirs Of An Imperfect Angel (released September 2009), her multi-platinum E=MC(2) (2008), and worldwide 10 million selling The Emancipation Of Mimi (2005).
Second, and on the downside, Romero and Savini opted for a grey makeup for the undead ghouls, and this is applied amateurishly in places. Frequently, there are zombies with grey faces and peach necks. Others are so underdone that they look like regular humans while another subset of zombies are so overdone that they appear almost cobalt blue. It’s perhaps a little strange and breaks the spell a little, but it’s a pretty minor problem.
It's a stunning tree when in bloom.
surrounded by breasts real enough to have men
Moving right along to the subject of Dhyana/Meditation… I don’t always MAKE time to slow down and enjoy my seat.
From size 4 - 18 there will be something for nearly everyone.
Thanks for stopping in!
Misty Neufeld-Gordley
And they are changing the world just by being who they are. In that sense, our job as parents is quite easy.
As I enter my third year of 'actively' blogging . . . and 'not' having a typical author's blogsite I find that most of the people I deal with on a daily basis, or my family, have never once opened up the blog, are not bloggers, do not have the slightest idea what it takes to keep up a blog yet all have STRONG opinions about it!
However, I did manage to create quite a fiesta for my taste buds yesterday, sans avocado, in the form of orange tempeh tacos with strawberry cilantro salsa. I didn’t measure anything and thus don’t quite have a recipe….but these tacos were awesome and deserve to be recreated. So, I’ll share with you a general ingredient list which you can play around with!
SHU IS ACTUALLY RIDING A GLORIFIED SEGWAY INTO BATTLE
The first photo below is of some of the shelves I'd already had set up, and as you can see I've arranged them at right angles to each other to get the maximum amount of shelf space relative to the floor area available for the shelves. As an example, eight shelf units that are four feet long and one foot deep can be set up at right angles in a long row of connected units so that you could fit those eight units in a 5-by-16-foot area--bolt four shelves together side by side (which would span 16 feet in length) and then bolt each of the remaining shelves perpendicular to the left end of the shelves that are parallel to the wall. (The shelves that are parallel to the wall are a foot deep and the shelves that are perpendicular to those shelves are four feet wide, for a total depth of five feet, and the four 4-foot-long shelves are 16 feet long when bolted together.)
A year and many other distracting dining experiences 'in the city' later, my 'Designer' friend happened to want to spend Labor Day at the Getty Villa (also in Malibu - well, technically Pacific Palisades, but close enough) - and that there is a ginormous seafood platter to be had for $19.95 "at some place called Paradise Cove Beach Cafe" - we quickly put the two together to make it a Malibu day trip adventure.
So I packed my bags and spent the night with the kids.
I have also been receiving inquiry's about Feng's previous post on the kit-bashed robot models. Those were by one of his students and are not being mass-produced (as far as I know). For more information please send further inquiry to the school's website.
you forgot, which is worse, far worse.
the ultimatum is out there.
I feel like a outlaw, broke my last glass jaw
Does this mean that the Unified Patent Court will get jurisdiction over existing or future SPCs based on national patents? Or maybe the Agreement is meant to refer only to SPCs granted on European patents but not national patents?
No one is going to confuse Winter’s Bone with Toy Story 3, but if you want a sign that American cinema is alive and well in 2010 then those two films would be a good starting point. And as different as those two are, they have themes that intersect. To borrow Bob Segers’ phrase, both films have characters “seeking shelter against the wind.”
Radio says it’s forty years today since Jim Morrison expired in a Paris bathtub at the classic recurrent rock-death age. I agree with This Life‘s Anna that the Beatles were just boring, and the Stones showed flashes and spasms of genius, but neither came close to the Doors in my view. It’s the bottleneck guitar, the Manzarek keyboard solos (if the Doors were around today, they would be making electronica) most of all the baritone drive and lyrical invention of Morrison himself. ‘You’re a poet, not a rock star,’ a woman says in one of the films, and his volume The American Night stands alone from the music and is worth coming back to. In interviews, Morrison came across as a thoughtful and perceptive man, and wasn’t afraid of contradicting his time – apparently he used to torment peacenik drummer John Densmore by placing flowers between his cymbals during gigs, so that Densmore was forced by momentum to clash them to shreds.
Spread mayo on both sides of bread. Put about 3 pieces of bok choy leaves, a few slices of tomato and 2 slices of cheese on sandwhich. I also put a vegetarian chicken patty on mine, which is shown in the pictures.
Published: April 8, 2012
But I will be able to point out that what he did was wrong. It was bad medicine, it’s bad for the economy, and I will repeal it.
Next Tuesday, April 17th, our Ale Star sessions in both Darlo and St Kilda get stuck into some wild, sour stuff from around the world, with each venue having a slightly different line up.
This is one of the best websites I've found on this topic. It has different sections that concisely explains concepts such us: producer, consumer, decomposer, omnivore, carnivore and herbivore. Additionally, the site offers a variety of games in each topic that are really instructional for kids where they will have to categorize organisms or make food chains. What I found interesting about this site is that has also big food chains that include lots of organisms and most importantly, that include decomposers.
How we can adapt
So the next time someone tells you that theological words don’t matter, that you’re quibbling over details, that you’re crippling faith and God’s mission in the world, that passion matters more than accuracy, remember that that person has no idea what they’re talking about. Oh, and remember to mind your iotas. They matter a great deal.
Under My Thumb
Dear 5k,
Annie taught Alex to move stuff and also she managed to Rentaghost Hal out of the building. Well, he isn’t a living thing.
For those that don’t think it’s worth it, think about this: your usual cable/internet bill is $100.00/month. You end up calling your cable company and get your price lowered to $80.00/month, keeping the same services. So now you are saving $20.00 every month, and you can do whatever you want with that money. Now, in this sense, some people still might think it’s not worth it to call and spend 20 minutes just to save 20 dollars. It’s a hassle. But it adds up. The 20 dollars in savings every month ends up being $240/year. Not bad, right? Now, the reason I chose cable and internet as an example is because most people need these in their everyday lives (internet more so than cable). So this “savings” won’t go away after just a few months or years. In 5 years, if you keep doing this, you’ll end up having an extra $1200 in your pocket. Think of everything you can do with that money!
I leaned against the new post, which was much more comfy than a metal stake up my back, and noticed that Joslyn, Kurt’s helper, would look back at me every once in a while as if he was thinking, “What’s wrong with that woman anyway is she weird or crazy or both?”
Our apartment was not clean and organized yesterday. But then I kind of attacked it with a sponge and a sink full of water. That’s how I spent my night, and I feel a lot better and really refreshed. (And I only feel slightly lame that I am 22, and this is the second post in a week about cleaning.)
From now on … he was to sleep out in the garage. He could take his meals in the house and bathe and go to the toilet there, but those were the only times they wanted him in there.
So the brothers made a run for it. By all accounts, while the younger one struggled to unlock a side door, the older one shoved Mr. Neesmith.
But for me what I'm really excited about is that my book has a water dragon in it. I had no idea when I wrote it that I would be in the midst of publishing it the year of the water dragon. It feels extremely fortuitous. This year should see the release of my ARCs and the beginning of promotion for PROPECHY. And with the guidance of the Water Dragon, I can only hope that all will go well for my little book!
In medium bowl, add 1 3/4 cup milk and box of Banana cream pudding mix. Use wire whisk to blend for 1 minute. Stir in banana slices. Set in fridge for 5 minutes.
The rapid demographic shift immigration brought to Peel Region in the Greater Toronto Area (GTA) is alarming and in my view is an attack on Canadians. According to the article:
I reach the 2 500 fans on facebook and Main Suspect reaches the 500 fans.
Spiritual Mumbo Jumbo:
Following that same vein, there is no hard data on what is exactly going on in social media. There is a plethora of quantitative data on how many views a page or post receives and from where the traffic originated, but there is no data on how content is perceived. Little to no accurate or complete qualitative data exists. Comments on wall posts or blog posts are qualitative, but it represents a very small portion of the readers. There is no data on how the other users who chose not to comment actually feel about the post. So while there is data on the number of viewers and when they viewed, there is little indication of their reaction to online content. This is where cultures can sour a bit. Austin Yelp Talk threads used to be filled with light-hearted banter and fun topics. Over time, a few users became snarky, rude, condescending. Some believed that if you ignored those users (often called trolls), they would go away. That is a very common technique in dog training using operant conditioning , i.e. not rewarding unwanted behaviors. However, the other issue is that if those users repeatedly violated the "be cool" guidelines in the terms of service without any one calling them out, then saying nothing is in some sense establishing that behavior as the norm. While users can flag rude and snarky posts for removal, most Austin Yelp users simply quit using the talk threads because the culture had changed.
Dare frame thy fearful symmetry?
These irreplacable little family breweries are still disappearing – Barth-Senger is by no means the first, and won’t be the last. It’s a terrible shame. So few people even seem to be aware of the huge wodges of beer culture we lose, every time one of them shuts up shop for the last time.
(404): my history teacher totally just suggested that we record his lectures and play drinking games with them later so that we pay attention to the material
And he saw an aura of blue exchanging ions into green while reconnoitring on his RAF plane
Four score and seven years ago our fathers brought forth on this continent, a new nation, conceived in Liberty, and dedicated to the proposition that all men are created equal.
In the wisdom of Christophe, when I lamented about this with him on the phone, he said in his BetterEnglishThanMyFrenchNotThatI'mJealousOrAnything, "They will understand later."
For now, I just want this cold to go away! Yuck!
To celebrate this cold snap I started one last scarf. It is simple 2x2 ribbing and the yarn is a nice chunky blend of wool and bamboo from my stash. I hope to finish it tomorrow and block it, hopefully this winter vacation will stick around long enough to get some use out of it this year. This project was mindless which is exactly what I needed to get going again. I did not get it posted in time for Nicole's Keep Calm, Craft on but here is it. Lots of great projects over there.
Security and stability operations are the language of the new colonialism, the recolonizers. This has been researched and described eloquently by Mahmood Mamdani. From an interview:
Reese Witherspoon, Chris Pine and Tom Hardy Form the
(Don't judge him for his t-shirt. I gave it to him for Christmas.)
One of the first to try and make a career out of hanging around other people while doing nothing: Jackson Browne. It wasn’t until the late 60s that it became possible to seriously think you could get away with it (Southern California had copious amounts of weed and cocaine amongst the hippie/music fringe types). Who needed a job when it was sunny?
right and isn't stressing over doing it later on. His world expands 1,000X each
Running up a winding driveway into pitch blackness, I called HB's name as I shone my flashlight all around the woods. I prayed that whomever's yard I was in would not come running out with a shotgun. None of the yards were fenced, rather, they--being built into the side of a very steep hill--were separated by retaining walls.
Good morning and thank you all so much for the wonderful congratulations and heartfelt comments you left yesterday you made me have a huge lump in my throat, I showed Phil your comments and he said 'what lovely people they must be'....I had a good time at the Craft show met a few people I knew, bought some paper, some more paper and a few more just for luck...oh and some ribbon, well a girl cant have too many can she, oh and I thought I had found the lace for my Nieces invitations but at £12.50 a metre I think not, considering I will need 20 metres...just a tad expensive lol...anyway stop waffling Mina and get on with the candy...
May 14th:
It is definitely a gumboots day today. It has been raining solidly since the early hours of this morning, and everywhere I look there is water. My chook feedhouse has an ankle deep moat around it and poor Mavis and Madge are looking decidedly bedraggled.
You will be faster than existing plans. If you decide to go in the plan has been tried by you online, Log Home Kits you will be able to start work or in a store. Use your time and look through them until you find something you like. You will focus on when it comes time to plan the perfect to suit your taste and your needs are sure to pass them.
If your new year's writing resolution was to get better at writing and maybe sell more stories, why not sign up for a course or two and give yourself a head start? There is nothing more inspiring than a good course with a great teacher. And I can personally vouch for both ladies mentioned in this post!
‘Risk of injustice’
Bake in a 375 degree F oven for approximately 45 minutes. Cool on a wire rack.
219 ** 4. “Slavery and the Constitution: Explorations.” Texas Tech Law Review, vol. 19, pp. 677-786 (1989). (Sources: Items C-1977(3), above, Items D-VIII/14/1986, D-IV/18/1985, D-VIII/30/1985, below, Item C-1981(3), above, Items D-I/30/1984, D-IV/12/1985, D-X/1/1963, below, and Item C-1977(8), above.) At page 679, line 33 should read, “citizens in the pre-glasnost Soviet Union ever had.” At page 725, line 7-8, “three decades” should read “two decades”. The block quotation at the top of page 739 ends in line 11. More corrections are needed. (Parts of this collection are incorporated in Item B-10, above (1999).)
They teach us so many things and it’s how we put that knowledge to good use that matters. Writers should take positive aspects from their favourite authors and use it to bolster the creative framework for writing.
I grew up with people telling me all the time that I’m meant to do great things or God has a special plan for me, etc… and a boy can’t help it grow up but with a sense of some entitlement to something great in life and I wonder if people continually pushing my thoughts and dreams towards an ambiguously “great” future. I sit and look at myself sometimes and see the person I have become… is this really what a great person looks like? Am i ruining God’s plan and in doing so ruining mine? How cruel! Grown ups pushed me to this thought process yet I feel like no one has prepared me for anything, of course, it’s greatly due to my lack of initiative in my own future but looking at my young self, there was no doubt in my mind I was headed towards greatness, even without discipline, of course discipline is blind to a young and naive kid like I was. Even during this pity party for myself, there is a glimmer of hope in knowing that God can use anyone.. anyone.
Since 2007, the rate has increased each year: 29.5 percent in June 2008, 44.7 percent in 2009 and 48.8 percent in 2010, based on EPI’s analysis.
One of the best things my mother could have taught me was the importance of learning skills, like sewing. She used to explain to me that I would need to use it in some capacity or other. Whether it be hemming or patching holes to avoid buying new clothing, or to make alterations to make immodest clothing modest, she knew I would use this skill at some point in my life.
This was an insanely decadent chocolate cake. Not only was it rich, but it was a big honkin' cake. This cake was made in my new 60th Anniversary Bundt Cake Pan from NordicWare available through William-Sonoma. I have a couple bundt type pans and they work well but I've always wanted a real NordicWare Bundt- I just love the sharpness of the detail in the pans. There are many copycat versions but the original is unmistakable. And I finally have one! I'm so excited.
The food.
"We are first and foremost a producer and printer of books, and we also offer a general printing service to our varied customer base. We don’t do “packages” as offered by other companies, as we feel this leads to confusion. We like to be as flexible as possible in our offering to our clients, as their familiarity with technology and file creation, and their individual needs vary considerably. Our emphasis is on producing a high quality product at a reasonable cost, whilst supporting and assisting the author. We supply ISBN/Barcode as part of the service, at no additional cost."
'Coming to terms with the monthly struggle of Big Fat Negatives was starting to take its toll on me. I have many hopes for the year ahead...all of them centered around becoming a Mumma'.
7. Letters are a vehicle for deep conversations. Correspondence is a wonderful forum for revealing who you are, what you believe, what you love and care for, how you observe the world.....
Language : Italian
6. Get 2 Tha Point (prod DJ Premier)
Be sure to come back on January 30 when the Zva Blog Hop starts off the new year with more creative Bang!! And prizes to be had!! So what do you think? Would you like to see more? If so you can join Zva Creative’s design team for their monthly blog hop on Monday. It will kick off right on the brand new Zva Blog starting at 9:00 am EST US. There will be plenty of inspiration to take in as our team shares artwork created with Zva Creative’s beautiful crystals, pearls and floral embellishments. You won’t be disappointed!
It is often very easy for us to believe that we cannot experience joy until we see this or that breakthrough in our children’s lives. We can actually come to the place where we feel disqualified from a life of joy because of the burden we bear.
The nine key diagnostic markers of narcissistic personality disorder and convincing examples where these have been on display by Malema, follow.
So, their latest makeup products would be their Christmas palette collaboration with Kate Spade.
AUTHOR INFORMATION: Darren O'Shaughnessy is the much acclaimed author of the "Saga of Darren Shan" and "The Demonata" series. He has previously taken various pen names such as D.B. Shan and Darren Shan which he now uses to differentiate between his adult and YA books. He was born in London but moved to Ireland during his childhood. He currently spends his time between living in the Irish countryside as well as in London. The first book in the "Saga of Darren Shan" was made into a film called "Cirque du Freak: The Vampire's Assistant" and was released a couple years ago.
Hebrews 9:27
Your baby will feel more relaxed, likely to go to bed easier and fall asleep more quickly if you establish a nightly routine from the time he/she arrives home! Bathing a baby is very soothing, so making it a part of the bedtime ritual is important. Ne sure to have all your Gerber essentials withing arms reach during and after bath:
The sad part of this swap is that this is the last one, the group will be closed. This is absolutely sad, it was the first ever swap I did and it felt so much like home. I will miss the swaps with all the talented and inspiring Ladies in the group. A big thank you to Viv who has been the soul and inspiration behind the group all along! Petra.
If you’d like to list your child’s name in the comment section, I’d be honored to pray for them. No one will ever pray for your children like you. But no one will ever understand the prayer of a mother’s heart like another mother!
Full ingredient list for a Chicken McNugget (from McDonald’s US website):
Food Stuff:
To admit that I’m clearly not more than a fan to him, but to me, he’s clearly and could possibly be everything to me forever. To see him obliquely in such peculiar ways, even so, our eyes have met.
I heard “And now, it’s time for our baptism….” and came running.
Stating - Date - Price - Maker it sure would be a lot of fun to look at it today.
Me (pshaw): Yea, right…..that is so lame. No one likes eyes!
Now although I don't claim the towering imagination of my literary heroes and heroines, I do at least lead an ordinary life and am really very boring. I'm beginning to think that's OK. It may even be a good sign. Take note all would-be writers:it is not necessary to be personally very interesting in order to write.It is not even necessary to do anything very interesting at all, ever, you can make it all up.
PhoneFetcher is an elastic bungee cord that has a clip on one end (one that is super easy to open and close I might add…nothing drives me crazier than not being able to easily open or close a clip) and something that resembles a headphone outlet. The elastic bungee is long enough to hang out of your purse to remind you when your phone isn’t attached and it makes searching around your purse for a ringing phone a thing of the past…you simply follow the elastic bungee cord from your purse to your phone. I have to tell you, I’m a little bit in love with this product!
I've been thinking lately how much more "living" we are doing in our house compared to before we had Reid. I feel like our house used to just be where Chris and I would meet up at the end of our long days. As pitiful as it is, we hardly even ate dinner at our house together. We were hardly ever there. I would usually stay at work until 7 or 8, Chris would usually stay at work until 10 or 11 (the years when he wasn't traveling all week), and our house was just our house. Now, I feel like it is our home, and I love that. Now we have cheerios on the floor, toys EVERYWHERE, and I am actually using the kitchen! It's not always spic and span, but I kind of love that. It means we are living in our home and not just sleeping there. I feel like Reid loves being at home too. He doesn't ever want to leave the house (which can be kind of frustrating), but I'm so glad he is happiest when we are home. I hope he always feels this way! :)
Then back upstairs to the boxes and the shelves, to lists and guidelines. Mike, Paul, Trupti are at their stations and Rachel who is helping out is available to help me in particular. Katie comes in later. I leave about 6pm. Judith is still working upstairs. She usually is, till late.
Thanks for understanding and playing along!
These girls sit around a house with no tv, no radio, no internet & no job to occupy their brain. So, there they sit….thinking, analyzing, scheming about this guy & daydreaming about where their wedding will be & if Colin Cowie will plan it. Telling themselves 500 times a day, I LOVE him, I l-o-v-e him, I love HIM, I think I may LOVE him?! There you have it. And most importantly, they don’t have their sister or their best friend there to say…..”you do NOT love him. You don’t even know him….what does he order on his pizza? Seeeeeeee…you don’t love him!”
Spewing forth from my head, exploding like a volcano from my heart. Erupting in time with me confusion and loneliness, my uncertainties? I’m just a soul in a small shell, you see?
In creditable sex scenes of Scott with Elizabeth that happened at the field trip in the bed room of a hotel that left Amy speechless when Elizabeth the evil side of her decided to call her and left it as. (See the movie) anyhow, this left Amy gets even pissed off at Elizabeth, without a hesitation Amy decided to do the unthinkable and switch …
We had a phenomenal amount of entries last month to our Love is in the air challenge. Thanks so much to each and every one of you who took part. Also a big thanks to Lindsay who was our Guest designer.
Acts 2:36
If you have made up your own mind that you want to live the rest of your life suffering, if you have made up your mind that you want to go to hell, please think of your children, consider your children, because if you are not a friend of God it is difficult for blessing of God to come upon your children.
mixed media with bees wax on paper, 19x24, 'The Locked Box'
They hook you up to an I.V.
Here is a little gift set, that I have made for a friend who is terrible at remembering birthdays and sending a card. So this set is an hint for her to get a pen out and send someone a card. She's forever saying " I need to get a thank you card ", so inside I've also done some labels, with THINKING OF YOU - HAPPY BIRTHDAY & THANK YOU. Those can be placed on, as of when she needs them.
All is well with Bobby Roode, because he is still our World Heavyweight Champion. He made a promise to us a few weeks ago, saying he would walk into Lockdown, and still defeat “Cowboy” James Storm in front of his home, his backyard. And he made that call right. And he will give Storm credit, James did say he would give Bobby a Last Call Superkick, and he did that, yet he still defeated our hero, James Storm. He has defeated our heroes, Storm, AJ Styles, Sting. And now, there isn’t a hero left to defeat.
Is this the worst TV interview show ever?
From where he’s been to where he’s at …. he has turned his life around successfully and he will continue to.
The new campaign will be rolling out across Drambuie's markets around the world next year, but London is getting a bit of a sneak preview over the next few weeks with this new print work.
The Sarasota County Sheriff’s Office has arrested five St. Petersburg residents in a scheme to steal nearly $11,000 merchandise from a Sarasota store on Monday.
Stay tuned for part 2.
Final Score: 5.5/10
Then came my ill advised 48 hour trip to Spokane to visit Laura a week later. I drove the 285 miles each way, listening to audio books and stopping regularly at Dairy Queen franchises for soft serve cones to fuel the journey. I agreed to make the trip because she wanted me to see her new apartment and......she was alone for the weekend and felt like company would be nice. In her defense, I think she anticipated tackling a few small (sorting/organizing) projects but, NO.....over ambitious Mom was in high gear and ready to work relentlessly on a life-long project that, unless I consciously put a stop to it, will never (ever) end. She and I are both too old (in different ways) to be doing this dance. She ends up frustrated. I end up frustrated and things go to SHIT before long; usually by the 24 hour mark. In retrospect, her apartment looked better for my visit but at what cost to us both? Live and learn over and over and over again.
salt (for salad)
Here the Road Map for the near future as I see it. These changes will be implemented gradually.
This is another of those non standard awards. Though I think there should be some way of evaluating how well our meets do every year. If for no other reason than to tweak them for the better. Because the better we present our product, the better the sport should become.
****happy monday!***
4 Factors that Drive the Cost of Dental Implants:
would have predicted a career as a picture book illustrator? I'm not sure I would have.
But that’s just stupid. And my parents would be devastated and i could never do that to them.
This morning she finally lost her battle. I know she had reached a point where she had had enough, and the only consolation is that she is now at peace.
It's been a while. Oh how the tides have changed!
By this......
5. Experiencing the grief at the sudden and tragic death of a young woman of faith who earnestly lived her faith in the nearly 20 years I have known her.
So done:
Prima
The biggest quirk, however? Sheri Moon Zombie‘s insane, creepy high-pitched laugh. From the years and years of listening to the music from this movie, I had just assumed it was a sample taken from some Japanese anime. It sounds like a tiny Asian girl. It just does NOT look right coming out of her mouth. She is freaky, smoking hot, insane, scary, and will be haunting my nightmares for some time. Clint found her to actually be scarier than the axe-wielding variety of killer found in the movie, because she’s so cute she could kill even the most paranoid.
Today our OOTD is based on this absolutely gorgeous KAFTAN i found on kaboodle.com *hehehe funny name*
G.) Head hunter from Malaysia
With Brayden in the picture now, it has become crystal clear to us that this has to stop in front of him. We would never want Brayden to think that we were purposely being disrespectful to each other. That is not the example we want to share with our son. And it hasn't been an easy habit to break!
I track him in vain!
I will be back with photos and news of our travels.
bhūmir āpo ’nalo vāyuḥ
The Japanese Madonna
(Officially Out of Fresh Photos is a very uncomfortable label with which I do not care to associate.)
Personal Comments:
Well, in essence, what Jules says to Jimmy is this:
Once upon a time, there was a common gray tree frog, minding its own business. And yet, this was a slightly ditzy Hyla versicolor, prone to making less than perfect decisions. However, in its defense, it had never been accused of being OCD.
him. She swam to the bottom and pulled Jim out.
"There's just not enough affordable housing available for senior citizens," said the Rev. Floyd Flake, the group's chief executive officer. "What we provide is the ability to live with dignity in the latter years of their lives."
You know I honestly didn't think I'd find a picture of someone actually jumping a gun. Who knew. It is amazing what you can find on the web, isn't it?
Pork Chops and Apple with bacon-roasted cauliflower
Fast forward a week... I'm out running errands, it's a gorgeous day in Port Isabel and I think I'll swing by Windy City and try a hot dog since Ian said they were so good. I was disappointed to find the umbrellas down (the sun was straight overhead and I needed an umbrella if I was going to sit outdoors). I went ahead in, thinking I might get something to go. The server asked if I wanted to sit out back. I didn't know there was an out back, so sure, I said. Sounds great.
Spread pesto on the freshly grilled pizza dough. Drape with prosciutto and layer on arugula and grapes (if using). Using a vegetable peeler, shave the cheese and layer on top. Finish with the pepper and truffle oil (if desired).
Another artifact of fire that I recall seeing when I was a kid was something that one of my friends showed me. My friend's father had a rectangular mass of nails that had been melted together. His father had found them after a fire at a business place. The nails had apparently been inside of a box which had acted as a mold to keep the contents intact after the box itself had burned away. The individual nails could still be seen, but they had been fused into the permanent shape they now held.
the faded cards
We last left off with this piece of drama where the Worthless Co-Worker threw the boss under the bus. She and the district manager went on a 2 1/2 hour journey through the mall where the Worthless Co-Worker aired every grievance imaginable she had in her little demented mind.
“Sh,” Brulee replied, her voice a barely audible whisper. “There are people outside. I think they have blocked the exit.”
I thought this was a very strange thing to say, right up until I saw a tie that just screamed at me. It was a kind of psychedelic paisley thing that would contrast the Slate Grey Suit in a most tasteful way. Suddenly I understood what the Salesman meant.
Overall, I'm happy that I was suckered (and so are the kids). I haven't tried injecting our puffs with anything yet but I'll probably try that next. Jam, pudding, whipped cream? The possibilities really are endless!
I was lucky to win Teddy Bo recent Blog Hop prize, so watch this space some new cards we be coming with the new digis of Teddy Bo, don't you just love this bear.
I love the way the faces of the sitters look at you – direct but so calm. Beautiful.
Phone No : 01225 768107
The Moon has also been called Selene and Mama Quilla, Changing Woman by the Navajo…many names, many of which are quite ancient and have been handed down for generations of time. In many cases, the Moon’s name was secret and known only to the Initiates and the medicine people or the shamans. To the people, it was simply the Moon, but the shamans knew the personal, magical name of the Moon.
WDW Moss to DMC 731 --- am using DMC 3833 (wanted the word Love to be pink/red not green)
Top : Secondhand from Northcity OpShop in Papanui
Creep
If someone loves you,
‘Although Exxon made 35 percent more profits since 2010, its estimated effective tax rate actually dropped. Citizens for Tax Justice reported Exxon paid only 17.6 percent taxes in 2010′,
Greg Scott: We're looking for an occupation beginning with T.
“There are strings,” said Mr Tappertit, flourishing his bread-and- cheese knife in the air, “in the human heart that had better not be vibrated. That’s what’s the matter.” ~~ Charles Dickens, Barnaby Rudge (1841)
Cinnamon Roll Pancakes
Flesch Quartet
I have enough knowledge about the anime industry to say that the writers really planned out this episode well within the context of the rest of the series. I’m not caught up with the untranslated editions of the novel, so I can’t make any comment about how the characters are supposed to turn out, but I can say with confidence that the anime does its job as an adaptation, transferring the story into another medium with a reasonable amount of success. The original light novel’s author really comes out in the dialogue, particularly because the main character’s numerous internal monologues come straight from the prose. Either way, the story-lover in me was treated to something really nice and juicy this week, and I can’t wait to write the post for next week’s episode.
A few last words, before leaving you to contemplate how beautiful YOUR face will look in this project;
Instead of making a random Pollack-like smattering of prints, I decided to “draw” a little picture with only my fingers and thumbs. As a child, I remember entertaining myself by inking up my fingers with magic markers and making prints all over construction paper. For some reason, I was fascinated by how I had a built in stamping system on my little hands. As an adult, I’m no less mesmerized.
We're proud of the work we do and the people we work with.
Some years ago as my interest in this subject area was developing, my force had supported me to undertake an MSc in Criminology and Criminal Justice at Cardiff University – I state this because they sanctioned my research project which is now publicly available in the university library and therefore, able to be summarised here.
You should be able to buy the ingredients for all these cleaners at your local supermarket. Please note that washing soda is different to baking soda. Sometimes there are two types of washing soda on sale - washing soda crystals and washing soda powder, buy the powder, it's easier to dissolve.
Ingredients: 1 Aubergine, 1 mozzarella ball, left over or any pesto.
Although it is still a bit early for her, at some point before graduation she should start reading the industry trades on a weekly basis (publisherweekly.com and publishersmarketplace.com are good places to start). She will absorb much industry information, and she will start to learn the names of companies and of people in the industry. As a starting point, it will be crucial that she has the names of all the major publishers and imprints memorized—it is a crucial foundation for becoming an agent, and it will be necessary, too, for her to know which publishers to apply to.
Genetic disorders, wrong postures and falling are factors that can cause this disease. Also, incorrect hand positions owing to participation in certain sporting activities can cause it. Diets high in salt and birth control medications are other causative factors. CTS can also be a consequence of some other illnesses such as diabetes.
If we’re trying to keep people out on the street for an extended action, or if projected legal consequences are slight, we might want to take opportunities to get quickly released from custody. If we have people to protect: individuals who might be singled out, internationals who face immigration issues, etc., we might employ a strategy that involves staying in jail until everyone is released. Or if we are asked to make unacceptable compromises in order to be released, for example, posting high bail or accepting conditions that might prevent us from doing future actions, we may need to use in-jail solidarity.
A Glass of Shadow; Liz Williams (NewCon Press)
may 2011
The posters go on sale starting tomorrow, April 26, and each will be priced at $45. The exact time will be posted on the @MondoNews Twitter feed. There are less than 400 of each poster printed (395 for Thor, 345 for Iron Man, 320 for Hulk, and 340 for Captain America), and these will sell out very fast.
"Every week."
15"x15" on paper, collage, molding paste, acrylic and white ink.
Pesto Pasta~
Knowledge is power, both for you and your mentor teacher. Be open (but professional!) about your take on strategies, management, etc. ASK questions, be open to new ideas from all angles. Be a team, it's an awesome advantage to have TWO teachers in the room! Use it- devise plans of attack, divide tasks, ask for help. Try to remember what it felt like being in the students' place. Talk to your students, especially if they are older, about their learning and expectations. Keep your college professor/supervisor in the loop! He/she is a WEALTH of information, but super busy, so ASK for resources, and if you need it, guidance!
In the official HI Certificate Of Live Birth below, the document header is preprinted with FILE NUMBER 151 - the state code.
FAVORITES: Shirer uses personal examples and common experiences to illustrate her points. I connected with her like I would sharing a cup of coffee with a girlfriend. Her insights make hearing from God less intimidating.
DCWV The Blossoms and Butterflies
Jackie Robinson - Montreal Royals
French President Nicolas Sarkozy called Mr Hollande a "little slanderer", while his rival said Mr Sarkozy shirked responsibility.
the existing mirror she used over her dresser, and a new long wall mirror.
Even the sources I am in contact with, all except for one, did not even have the need-to-know basis high enough to know why this happened. Or who was responsible for it!
I may have made a connection between my days of complete sadness and my period. Too much info? Sorry. But it's a revelation, if I'm correct. Pre-baby, and even pre-work, I wouldn't suffer too badly with pre-menstral symptoms. Cramps, a little irritability, stuff like that. Nothing major. (Unless you ask my husband, hah!)
Let the Right One In
Inside two ring pops, two candy necklaces, three gold strands of beads, three Pirate tattoos, and a pack of fruit snacks.
They had different classes for both adults and children. It was a sunny day, and all the riders had a great time.
or at least parts of one.
But there is one thing about the device I DO NOT like, at all, period, end of story.
It is fruitless to force a conversation with someone when you know he (mostly he) is not in the right frame-of-mind for the conversation.
I chose to color her in varying shades of red for iCopic's weekly challenge #67 -- red love. I added some glitter to her wings. I actually used some of my son's glitter glue and stickles. There's some glossy accents on the hearts on her wings. I added a love charm and a heart die cut from PTI's tiny tags. The butterflies are from Martha Stewart and the leaves are also from PTI.
I said a few pages back that God is a Being which contains three Persons while remaining one Being, just as a cube contains six squares while remaining one body. But as soon as I begin trying to explain how these Persons are connected I have to use words which make it sound as if one of them was there before the others. The First Person is called the Father and the Second the Son. We say that the First begets or produces the second; we call it begetting, not making, because what He produces is of the same kind as Himself. In that way the word Father is the only word to use. But unfortunately it suggests that He is there first—just as a human father exists before his son. But that is not so. There is no before and after about it. And that is why I have spent some time trying to make clear how one thing can be the source, or cause, or origin, of another without being there before it. The Son exists because the Father exists: but there never was a tune before the Father produced the Son.
It's time for another Fantabulous Bout of Books Read-a-thon! This is my starting line post, and I'll update here as well. We'll be on Twitter too, using the hashtag #boutofbooks. Come join the fun!
Iona read the first sentence of her book again. She’d been sitting on the riverbank for over an hour, staring into the water, but she just couldn’t get her mind to focus. For the thousandth time, she berated herself for being so foolish and impetuous. What had she been thinking jumping out of the carriage after someone she’d just met? And someone who had stolen all her jewels at that! He clearly was no paragon of virtue. The Highwayman must have something going on with that Gypsy girl. There’s no way he would ever be interested in Iona when he could have someone as exciting as that.
The administration continued to stand by this decision for two weeks after the rig exploded, and asserted that the disaster would in no way lessen its support for the lifting of a moratorium on offshore drilling off the Atlantic coast. As White House Press Secretary Robert Gibbs maintained to reporters a few days after the rig explosion, "In all honesty I doubt this is the first accident that has happened and I doubt it will be the last. We need the increased production. The President still continues to believe the great majority of that can be done safely, securely and without any harm to the environment."[11] [12]
The process for me first began with thinking about my goals for 2011 (and beyond), and what I would like to happen within the year in my art career. I knew I wanted to expand, make some forward movements with gallery representation and some great new exhibits at new galleries and collaborations. As well, I wanted to make solid commitments to my existing collectives, galleries and retail spaces, these have been so imperative in my art career and I am so grateful for the opportunities to show at Whitestone Gallery, UpTown Gallery, Barber Gallery, the Harris Collective..and the start of it all was the fabulous Elora-Fergus Studio tour.
My old Wall Street boss used to sit down in the basement of his big house and watch movies all weekend because he didn’t have the time to make any friends in the town where he lived and because his wife was so exhausted from raising his kids that she fell asleep early.
It's four days of inspiration, craft, business and community that you won't want to miss!
Rejuvenation
moisture, but what I don't like is that all of that wonderful glaze, all of the crispy, succulence of flavor is removed for serving. To me, that's not acceptable. It's like serving a cake and then removing the icing for goodness sake.
So there you have it. By no means perfect, but at least not embarrassing. How's that for aspiration? :)
Is it justified when the IPL authorities snubbed Pakistan players for the diplomatic relations between the two countries not being on good terms? Hence, one always says, Sports and Politics should never be married with one another. Leave sports alone, as it has the power bring nations to peace. At the end of the day, it is the fans of the game that are at loss for such quality players, who could have made the IPL even more exciting.
It's been an active week in the world of genealogy! So rather than limit myself to blogging about one topic I decided to mention a few.
New photographs taken of a vast glacier in northern Greenland have revealed the astonishing rate of the glacial breakup, with one scientist saying he was rendered "speechless."
Him and his friend Chris put on a semi-professional show,
Things have been pretty hectic in my world lately but it's calming down a bit now and I hope to have some fresh inspiration to share in the next couple of days. I even have some fabulous Blog Candy to giveaway, check back next week for all the details.
It seems that the past few years of my life have been primarily composed of the latter variety of hiccup. An assortment of enemies appeared out of the woodwork to take a shot at threatening my existence. First, there was this skeleton in the closet, and he emerged, bones rattling, cutlass in hand, and commenced to mar the walls with its unique brand of destruction. Then a monster crawled out from under the bed and howled like a banshee until my nerves began to fray at the edges and the weakened beams of the house began to crumble.
. And, if you want to bring your mother and father along,
However, Hulk Hogan, The Rock and his favorit ..John Cenna really seem to be NORMAL and appropriate FOR ALL AGES so if they will be apart of the act then maybe so! Geesh I get tired of even thinking like “the mom and dad” for real!
Never say I don't love you. Here I am at 11.15 at night. Others are still in the bar, drinking. Many have already staggered off to bed. And me? Here I am, sitting in my room at my laptop, because I promised you a live Festival blog and a Debi never breaks her promises.
So to win your very own gift basket, perhaps in time to give as a Valentine's Day gift, you have to leave a comment with an answer to this question: What is Claire Robinson's favorite recipe using chocolate?
Michelle Baharier, chief executive of CoolTan Arts, a mental health charity in Elephant and Castle, said: “This is just criminal. It is going to isolate people because they can’t afford to use public transport on benefits.
New Orleans will then make their second appearance on prime-time on Oct. 23, when they host the Indianapolis on NBC’s Sunday Night Football (7:20 p.m. CT) in a rematch of Super Bowl XLIV, when the Saints defeated the Colts 31-17 on Feb. 7, 2010. The following Sunday, the Saints will travel to the St. Louis Rams (noon CT) to close out their October slate.
Yesterday, police fired water cannons and tear gas at demonstrators who pushed through the barricade in front of the DBKL building, resulting in chaos on the streets.
so will of course nominate Newt Gingrich
Powers Gold Cup and Charlie Hall Chase on Sackville, the Irish Arkle Perpetual Challenge Cup in 2006 Missed That and in 2010 on An Cathaoir Mor as well as the 2001 James Nicholson Chase and Ericsson Chase on Foxchapel King. His biggest win during 2011 came in the Irish Hennessy Gold Cup, when partnered the Willie Mullins-trained Kempes to victory. He has had two Cheltenham Festival successes on Fadoudal Du Cochet in the 2002 Grand Annual Chase and Rule Supreme in the 2004 RSA Chase. He was still leading the field on Hedgehunter when the pair departed company at the final fence in 2004 but missed the winning ride a year later due to injury. He also came close to glory in 2008, when coming third on Snowy Morning. John Smith’s Grand National Record: 1997 New Co (15th); 2000 Lucky Town (8th); 2001 Strong Tel (Fell 6th); 2002 Spot Thedifference (UR 4 out); 2003 Cregg House (Ref 4 out); 2004 Hedgehunter (Fell 30th); 2006 Jack High (UR 15th); 2007 Bothar Na (PU bef 29th); 2008 Snowy Morning (3rd); 2009 Offshore Account (15th); 2010 Snowy Morning (6th); 2011 Arbor Supreme (Fell 28th)
‘There aren’t enough hours in the day’ …..bollocks! If there were more I can only surmise that I’d be awake for longer and therefore get proportionally less sleep. As things are right now when we are not working our ‘spare time’ is taken up by La Rectoria. And now our antennae are more acutely tuned as the pace of work continues on relentlessly.
Between Shades of Gray by Ruta Sepetys (ARC) (Penguin Canada)
But, gastric bypass surgery is no joke, my friends. It's fucking serious and would mean things like...no NSAIDS (non-steriodal anti-inflammatories). I'm on high doses of them, just like everyone else with arthritis. But because they are so stomach damaging, and gastric bypass gives you such a tiny little stomach, they are no-nos.
I told myself I would finally start making a proper cheesecake once I had the proper equipment. The biggest revelation that I had? Cheesecake can be baked (Didn’t know that before!). The possibilities were seemingly endless.
The actors had to go away
Cupcake Extravaganza!
*Pray with boys every night. Even when I am exhausted OR they have made me crazy!
(Get used to me saying redundant things like that, because I love it.)
Wendy Webb – Sleeping Cities
During the summer Hanks and I reconnected. Once again, I didn't question anything and just went about my life. We'd occasionally text and such but never saw each other. When my dad and sister were here and went out, they bumped into him. Hanks recognized them because my sister looks a lot like me, said hi and passed along hellos to me. It was like old times after that encounter. His texts cracked me up after my surgery, or it was the medication, but both Dirty and I were laughing at them. He answered a few questions I had about school and such. Once again, totally casual. Then we went out the other night with a few friends. It wasn't a planned get together, but we ended up talking all night and drinking beer with our friends. It was fun and I thought maybe we'd be able to be friends again, but no.
Thais Portilho-Shrimpton from Newsquest’s south London papers spoke about their recent dispute over redundancies to the group’s sports and leisure reporters.
it also holds my embellishments ( well what is left of them after purging)
Without Gwyna, Myrddin will not be able to work the most glorious transformation of all and turn the leader of a raggle-taggle war-band into King Arthur, the greatest hero of all time.
"I'm going to start moving deeper into the Sherim, very slowly. Look ahead of me and see if you can see me dying." With the task right in front of her, there was no human fear in Taslin. Nor did any reluctance make her falter.
a breathing space.
Oh, and Joolie gets a free ticket from me because years ago it was my fault that she was denied rollercoasters and had to settle for the Stockyards.
Moving stuff from one room to another.
* 1 (1 oz) package taco seasoning mix
I love those things on Goodreads and Amazon where they suggest books that you might like if you also like the featured book.
When I learned Thai, I was 19 years old, single and a missionary for my church. My church had a book and a system that they used and I was living in Thailand as well. I lived language learning. This isn’t the same with Spanish. Up until a few weeks ago, I was in a country that doesn’t have a large Spanish-speaking community. I am(have) 30 years with 4 kids and I work full-time. The strategies that I used and the overall system can’t be applied in the same way that I learned Thai.
We've got snow that is stuck to the ground...
Now, one day, I will learn how to make them from scratch, but until then this recipe will do. It is really very good.
Just last year, Arlington National Cemetery was embroiled in a scandal that illustrated how low we have fallen as a nation when it comes to proper reverence for our fallen military. In response to that scandal, a seventeen year old patriot in Virginia, Ricky Gilleland, has taken it upon himself to create a database with photos of the graves of those killed since 9/11 at Arlington, so relatives can 'visit' the grave sites of their loved ones whenever they wish. He started it with $200 of his own money and countless hours wandering through Lot 60 at Arlington, photographing graves and posting them on his website, preserveandhonor.com. Patriots like Gilleland remind us that honoring our dead is necessary to remind us of just how precious our freedom is, and what a great price we have paid for it as a nation.
I opened the door, peeked down the Hall. Noone. Hmm. My brain was sorta freaking out on me. What should I do???
Ray Brown - string bass on "Razor Boy"
According to the Herald-Sun, the arrest “resulted in about $500 in damage to the car” of the defendant. (For reasons that the story failed to explain, the arresting officer threw the photographer up against his car.) A spokesperson for the Durham Police said the department wouldn’t conduct an internal affairs investigation of the incident.
That said it all!
It's been shot from every angle, in every room in the house, over several different days. And this is the best I could come up with :-)
Add one teaspoon of bicarb soda and one teaspoon of salt to the water. Let it sit for about ten minutes. The tarnish will disappear without you touching it. Rinse and dry.
It’s interesting because in the 2004 comedy Meet the Fockers, Streisand made her big screen return as Ben Stiller’s mom in his popular Gaylord Focker franchise. Instead of being entombed her in upper middle-class swaths of respectability, Streisand instead, embraces all the Borscht Belt comic clichés of Jews. As Rozlyn Focker, Streisand’s done up in New Age garb, with flowing scarves and low cut tops, revealing an ample cleavage. Is it high art? Nope. Is it subtle? Of course not. Is it funny? You betcha. Streisand never was so appealing and likable – by embracing the Jewish mama stereotypes, she transcends them (after all, despite being incarcerated in years of mediocrity, she’s still Barbra Streisand). Meet the Fockers dealt with a man’s quest to impress his gentile in-laws (played by Robert DeNiro and WASPiness personified, Blythe Danner). By doing so, he starts to cringe and feel ashamed at his more ethnic parents (Streisand is paired, note-for-note with a hilarious Dustin Hoffman). There is something ugly Stiller being so embarrassed at his kvetching parents, who barrel into every scene with good humor and kindness. But there’s a subtle parallel in Streisand’s slowly evolving public persona that does the same thing: etch away at spots of “otherness” to settle comfortably among the starry Mount Rushmore of Superstars like Oprah, Julia Roberts, Will Smith (whose lack of cool should also be analyzed) and Tom Cruise.
Where the logging track turns abruptly left, I continue straight on, southwards along a wide grassy path, beneath bright sunshine through stands of young pine. Not quite at the stage of first thinning, they line up in green rows, like soldiers on parade, intermingled with a fifth column of seedling birch.
To make the sandwich, preheat the grill. Spread a thin layer of margarine on one side of each slice of bread, don't use too much, you don't want it to be soggy. Build your sandwich on the grill, first slice of bread, margarine side down, then add a slice of cheese, then the ham, then the other slice of cheese, then the caramelized onions, top with other slice of bread - margarine side up.
Last week, when I was at Barney's to pick up Mr. Alexander Wang, I spent a little time playing at the makeup counter. I hardly ever do this, because I'm surrounded by makeup and beauty products all day, but it's part of my job to stay on top of things.
Quote: “Hmm… Barney’s movie had heart, but ‘Football in the Groin’ had a football in the groin.”
Gaspe is often chilly in May, and near the water it's even colder! But, gods, is it beautiful.
Today, Proton is not exactly in the pink of health.
As we approach Easter, will you cross the line to the Cross of Christ?
Well, I’m giving my support to the Bersih movement. I realised I was really shallow up till now to not bother about politics back home. If I want to shape my own country, I definitely would want it best for my children, and my grandchildren, and their grandchildren.
President Barack Obama trails three of the four Republican candidates in head-to-head match-ups if the election were held today, according to a new Iowa Poll.
Sometimes I can't help but just sit back and watch my two little comedians during the day. This week has been no exception, as both kiddos have been really silly since Santa came! We have barely had the TV on at all, just playing and playing with our new toys and exploring our new abilities. The new abilities being Corinne has really started grabbing & taking things from Landon. I think it's funny...Landon, not so much. haha! She's already awesome at sitting up and though she still wants her Momma close by, she's content to sit in the floor and play.
He's the only one over there and he walks back and forth thinking about something that is consuming his life and everything he thinks he knows about it.
But my experience trying to write a reply to tripadvisor has been less than fruitful. You can't suggest anything, you can't advertise (asking a reviewer to check details on the website for example) and if you feel a review is fake you get 250 characters to explain why.
Place on the tray - allow at least an inch between each one for spreading. Bake for 15-17 minutes, until golden. Cool on a rack and store in an airtight tin.
Anyway, the two teams have to cook two of Patina’s appetizers (hamachi and risotto) and entrees (scallops and beef, two ways) up to Patina’s standards. At least they got a demonstration from the Patina chefs before they were out on their own.
Anyway, I took some amazing knowledge and experiences back to St.John's with me and proceeded to use it to develop the biggest and most-attended Pride Week in the history of the province during St. John's Pride Week, July 2011.
52. Imaginary Girls Nova Ren Suma
Pantages plays us four-a-day, besides the supper show.
The one little guy took a long time to focus. He sort of looked spaced out. But once my niece had him on her lap and got his attention by making noises and putting her hair in his face .... he finally centered on her. It took awhile. Then we got a huge toothless grin. He has problems with his hands and feet always twitching and then he scratches his head ... so he still has to wear little baby mittens and be swaddled at night.
The case came before the Constitutional Court in August this year.
10/25/2008 - Madison, WI - Orpheum
“Imagination is more important than knowledge, for knowledge is limited while imagination embraces the entire world.” Albert Einstein
Finish off, sew to body @ row 12 (marked row)
It is interesting how Brooks opens the piece with an introduction of Peter Thiel’s academic path, training as a lawyer and a distinguished federal clerkship. It sets an ironic beginning in which Thiel, product of an extremely competitive developmental track, seems like maybe he has forgotten how valuable that competition was to his own development. When Brooks writes:
Carson has had a long-term substitute for the past few months because his teacher had a baby. We've loved having Mrs. Addison here and are sad that today is her last day with the kids. Carson really, really liked her :(. I always make paper bag albums for the boys' teachers at the end of the school year, but since this was Mrs. Addison's last day, we were sure to bring hers in today:
Publisher ISBN or author’s ISBN
If you are interested in getting rid of your monthly cable and satellite bills, and being on the leading edge of technology, you can click the image below to read on How To Watch TV Shows Online.
5.blood n guts n rock n roll
adversity: boiling water. Each reacted differently. The carrot went in strong,
different doctors, including
The Holy Spirit pleads;
Relatively speaking…
So, 300 euros down the drain, a bollocking by phone from severe french lawyer lady (resulting in a hysterical crying and throwing things fit in my office one lonely day in autumn 2009), we found ourselves stuck with the flat and stuck with the neighbours.
And, even though Mr. A&A is globe-trotting again, I tucked a card in-between a stack of folded shirts into his luggage last week. He gave me a silly card and perfume before he left and I will definitely spray some on today!
Was reading the financial press today and found out that Research in Motion, the maker of Blackberry (NASDAQ:RIMM, TSE:RIM) is down 20% overnight on horrendous quarterly report figures.
Thank you for visiting “A Writer’s Playground.” Please come again soon. Bring a friend.
What am i doing now...？
Seriously, by following the submissions guidelines for each query you write and double-checking that all is professional and spelled correctly, you’ll be ahead of 85% of all other queries.
I'd like to enter this card above into St Luke's Charity Card Challenge, which is 'one layer' this month. It's a great cause, and even better, you can send cards to them to be sold to raise much needed funds. Why not hop over and see the DT cards, they're fabulous and might well inspire you to enter!
Dear John
Enjoy you Sunday and thanks for looking
I ordered several copies of the Minnesota Grown magazine. It’s a book/magazine with a listing of every farm, market, etc and their product (s) registered with the farmers association this year in the state of Minnesota.
Just this past Saturday, Olive Studio had the pleasure of being invited to participate in the Wedding Co. Spring Show at the Drake Hotel. Vendors from all over Toronto set up for this unique wedding show that spilled onto all floors of the Drake Hotel. What I liked especially, was that it wasn’t over the top. It didn’t have aisles and aisles of overwhelming booths for brides and grooms to literally feel dizzy before they even began the venture. It was simple, artistic and had a very candid and friendly approach. It molded quite perfectly to my style and approach to photography.
“The first fourteen days of an administration will be critical for Rangers’ employees as, if administrators do not terminate their employment during that period, any wages and salary accrued after the fourteen days rank highly in the administration and are more likely to be paid. The practical implication of this rule is that it may be the players on the highest salaries that are most likely to have their contract terminated before expiry of the fourteen days.
And he whistled, and shouted, and called them by name;
In ancient days, the term Russ or Rus was often applied to the eastern Slavs who lived on the great steppes, or fertile plains, around the fortress of Kiev. This powerful city was very important from the 800s to the 1100s. Although it is now the capital of Ukraine (with a modern-day spelling of Kyiv), it is still referred to as the Mother of Russian Cities. From Russ comes the word Russia.
Gosh, that town of Gori, close to the Ossetian border - just a normal NATO base, not a springboard into Ossetia?
Myth #7 was not only busted before the Smokefree Coalition published their briefing paper, it was also busted by the very same people who helped to produce the lie in the first place.
I find this interesting because Patricia actually wore this dress in "Bright Lights" with Joe E and Ann Dvorak..."Broadway Joe" must have been the original working title for the film. I have found this to be a fairly common occurence with vintage stills, either the titles were different OR in the case of another Pat Ellis still I have seen, she was announced as "next appearing in Howard Hawks' "Tiger Shark" with Edward G Robinson", which she did not (tho i wish she did, she would have been much better than rather colorless Zita Johann who did co-star in it), so sometimes we can see clues to how films underwent changes before and/or after cameras rolled.
I already did a photo-shoot with them eight years ago for the wire. And on that occasion they travelled around Iceland with me, but it appears they never made that link.
I am the living bread that came down from heaven; whoever eats this bread will live forever; and the bread that I will give is my flesh for the life of the world.
The agency noted that the decline was influenced by the ongoing economic crisis and record unemployment, despite reductions in house prices and mortgage availability.
Date of birth: 1931
Foiled: U.S. Attorney Steven Dettelbach, left, and FBI special agent in charge Stephen Anthony walk past a map showing the location of a bridge on Ohio Rt. 82 south of Cleveland on Tuesday, May 1, 2012
1. To make the caramelized onions, heat butter and 1 tablespoon oil in a large skillet over medium-low heat. Add onions, cover, and cook until they begin to soften, stirring occasionally, about 10 minutes. Add sugar, 1/2 teaspoon salt, and 1/4 teaspoon pepper, and raise heat slightly. Cook, uncovered, until onions are golden brown, stirring occasionally, 25 to 30 minutes. Stir in thyme, and set aside.
“I dreamt about rain last night. It could have been 500 degrees or 500 below, and we’d be happy,” Walsh said. “The rain makes it better. We felt like warriors out there.”
The women on the rooftops of Hastinapura already discussed this “impossible” number of wives. Kṛṣṇa himself is impossibility in reality; the unlimited being. Numbers are insignificant in regards to his unfathomable dimension.
10. Women blink twice as many times as men do.
Turns out expats can be pretty curious folk: we met an ethnomusicologist from Boston, who’s been in and out of Taiwan for the last 25 years studying the music of the indigenous groups here. He’s picked up Mandarin and Taiwanese, and is working on learning the Amis peoples’ language, too! Just the fella to speak to for the local goss.
What do you do to de-stress?
Soak your clams in a bowl of water to clean them. If the water starts getting nasty, dump it out and refill it. If there are any broken clams or open ones that are unresponsive do not cook them because you will probably die and then your idiot family will spend the rest of their days clogging up our court system in a vain attempt to cash in on your stupidity.
The list is selective, but it would be interesting to see a list of all the "urban development experts" that support this project. (Is an expert an advocate for development like the Partnership for NYC? ) Where's Roger Green, who represents the area as an Assemblyman and was a major force behind the CBA? And didn't Gotbaum say she wouldn't support the project if it included eminent domain?
Another example is the greatly increased interest in Eastern religions, which in these past two or three decades have become tremendously fashionable. Now there are Western-born, American and English gurus and Zen masters, and so forth. And people take it quite seriously. All these Eastern things have become quite an American institution, with people bowing down to the ground before Maharaj-ji and others who proclaim themselves to be God. This has been quite unheard of until the last two or three decades. And these are ordinary, idealistic Americans who are quite capable of bowing to the ground before Maharaj-ji.
I guess it literally adds definition to the outfit.
Publication is scheduled for early March. So in a just a few weeks, I'll learn how to say "Lisa is pregnant," in a whole new language!
SINODEFTIKA 8
Paul had already set the example. He knew from the Lord that he would see Rome. But he did not simply rest on that promise but worked and helped and used common sense. They were in strife and we read, “We cast with our own hands the tackling of the ship.”
(Durex Global Sex Survey)
What is your take on "spring cleaning"? How do you choose which items from an estate sale, however adorable and criminally inexpensive, come home with you? Do you have a particular method you use to keep your house less clutterlicious than mine, or is it something genetic I can't hope to improve upon naturally (creams? injections? Is there a miracle pill I can take)? Working around all these books, I've rustled up a stack of titles like Let Go of Clutter and Clutter Busting, and while I'd rather read a book about mummies or McCoy vases, I've vowed to settle down and try to learn something from people who do this professionally. Because again, how much better would my life be if I wasn't tied down by a dirty house and no time to clean it?
Rockville, MD 20855-1812
the next day, i felt numb, hurt, wronged, betrayed. how could she do that to me? and put all the blame on me?
I hear, ker thunk, SPLASH.
The first two seasons were marked by the outstanding acting of Robert Sheehan, who plays Nathan Young, a teen without a single filter in himself. The first 14 episodes are highlighted by his unexpected humor in situations that, in real life, should not be in the least bit funny. On top of his colorful character, every probation officer that comes to work with them dies. Despite their ongoing attempts to finish their probation and prevent their probation officers from dying, external complications always finish off their supervisor.
If John Allen Muhammad really did hole up in a JF safe house in Virginia in the fall of 2002, it was more likely to have been this one in Meherrin than the one previously reported in Red House. Meherrin is considerably closer to where he is known to have been, and it would have taken a lot less winding along back country roads to get there.
* Dental Decalcification
Here is what people are saying:
And on Iran, J Street applauds the Obama Administration's diplomatic engagement with the Mullahs and opposes harsh sanctions, let alone any military response to Iran's growing nuclear capacity.
01 talk by Gillian + crowd noise 0:42
Even worse than that, having pages and pages of detail about what it was like to drown, it turns out that Mal'akh had filled the tank with the same breathable goo as they used on Elisabeth Mastrantonio in 'The Abyss' and everyone's fine by the start of the next chapter.
Not you as some pale poetling seated at a desk lisping cadenzas
At night 11pm Rebecca and sicko both meets at the restaurant for dinner.
Apparently some parents of his friends have walked past him with their
The champagne flute is almost always used for champagne. However, modern tables also use it for personalized cocktails and fun, fizzy drinks.
Here’s the skinny on Avalanche Vanilla Porter:
Can you imagine paying theses kinds prices for clothes now? I don’t know about you but my closet would be.. well lets just say I’d need a whole bedroom to converted into a closet, haha.
Gravitational acceleration
First of all, the design and location of the house came from 3 of my favorite movies. For the location of the house, I wanted it to be on the edge of a cliff, like Windward House from the 1944 movie The Uninvited
Only a couple of months back I was watching Ranbir Kapoor talk about ‘fans’ on “Frankly Speaking” on Times Now and I found his thoughts to be refreshing! He mentioned about his father’s haughty behavior towards the “approaching fans” and thus his determination as a young kid that if ever he became a celebrity he would always respect his fans because it is because of the fans that a film star is born and sustained! He sounded noble and “hat-ke” though in reality if he really practices it is yet to be confirmed…
To go out of his cocoon,
"For you, cheap price. Only 75. Today is good day, too. We not so busy on Wednesday," he continued in his broken accent.
- languages (English in particular, I absolutely adore it)
Fafnir, aghast with remorse, is about to cut the demon-arm off, but the witch turns him on Conan instead. Still, Conan is an even match, until the witch brings them to her, so she can focus her power on the arm. Now outmatched, Conan is on the verge of being crushed, but manages to destroy the witch's power-glass with a thrown rock. The witch, and the arm, collapse into ash; and the thugs try to get revenge themselves. As you'd expect, they fail miserably, but in a nice touch the surviving girl gets to avenge her friend. Fafnir sadly joins Conan and the girl, as they ride off.
I am quite pleased with the results and found that the Distress Inks were much
Yet...yet at the end of the day, I was greeted with an impromptu cocktail made with Germain-Robin brandy, fresh loquats picked from our yard, peach bitters, and a squirt of lemon. Didn't even have to ask.
Me: What about a Wii do you have a Wii?
Dazzling and joyous, Eau de Paradis springs to life in a burst of freshness, a frisson of voluptuousness.
25) When I was 11, I only weighed 55 lbs.
“Yes, childhood is supposed to be a period of innocence, but as long as people who prey on children exist, parents must be watchful…. Reopening the public to the Etan Patz case hopefully will caution parents to dangers sadly still present.
The only way you can do that is not run a welfare system and a warfare system in policing the world.
In their own country people who didn’t understand their culture shied away and feared them. The modern clan’ her momma had told her, they had come to have their fortunes read, they came to get Auntie to make their red and purple flowing skirts and hoop earrings, their magic potions and liniment ointments, but not here. Here was cold and uninviting here was …. Home.
* Why don't you voluntarily go to court and show South African police suspicions are wrong?
In '33 Joe Schenk and Darryl Zannuck bring their fledgling 20th Century Pictures in to join the rest of the gang on the lot. They would leave a couple of years later when they merged with Fox. (Don't Mary and Doug look delighted?)
Africa has also given celebrities and politicians power based on their confessed concern for the continent. Sir Bob Geldof, ex-singer with the Boomtown Rats and Bono, the lead singer of U2, are the self-proclaimed champions of Africa. Geldolf has described himself as “Mr Africa”.
Hartnett
On that note, we will be going through a bit of a communications blackout both here and on the Facebook page. As I’m the only active writer for the site, the site sort of hinges on my ability to post news. Well this weekend that will not be possible, which is also evidenced by the fact that I haven’t written a new issue of Week(ish) In News in, well a week…ish.
The first minister says that he believes one of the root causes of sectarianism can be traced back to Northern Ireland’s segregated school system.
So I'm taking the bull by the horns and I'm going crazy this week. I'm trying a new recipe every night, except for the built in leftover nights, which are still new recipes, kinda'. I sent out a desperate plea on facebook for new recipes then I got this crazy email chain letter (which I never do and hate getting) about recipes. I apologize now if you got that chain letter from me, feel free to ignore it, and you don't need to notify me. I really don't care, I've already gotten a few new recipes to try so I'm happy. I also finally got my new MOPS cookbook so this weeks menu looks like this:
Hey Friends, I was wondering - Does painting with a sponge count as REAL art? Some people use their fingers, some use a stick, some even use drips or a spoon. So I think it's OK to use anything you want, not just a brush.
View "creating a Photoshop pattern" video to see a demonstration on how to create your own pattern and apply it to a layer by using the Pattern Overlay effect in Photoshop. The Pattern Overlay window allows you to adjust the scale of the patterns, the opacity, and use the Blend Mode effects. Note: As mentioned in the video, the layer cannot be blank but must have a color or image on it for the pattern to be visible. The color/image does not have to fill the entire layer. Hint: If you wish to have a transparent background for your pattern so that it can be used on any color or motif, make sure that the layer that the pattern was created on is transparent and none of the layers below it are visible including the background layer.
Wait For Me...the Playmates
Limitations
Lynette realizes she needs to make some changes and Renee reminds her how much yoga helped her in college. Lynette takes up the practice again – will this help her relax? And maybe get Tom back?
Local residents of this small town had mixed feelings about security concerns that al-Qaida would try to disrupt the trial with new attacks, though most were confident the staff could handle it.
As late as 1860 the term still seems to be in use:
"Don't worry," we told the children. "We'll help you."
The sentiment is from Waltzingmouse and I have stamped it on kraft (well the closest I can get to kraft!) cardstock. I really like this look as it makes the sentiment stand out.....def be doing it again!!
for a well-bred pup
A first proof can be expected within 3 business days. Once the transaction has taken place, there is no exchange.
“AB has always tried to hedge. They bought a big hop farm in Northern Idaho --the Boundary Farm -- and a 40 hectare farm in Huell, Germany, adjacent to the German Hop Research Institute which at the time used that farm to field test promising new cultivars. Even when I was going public with Hallertauer MF ‘analogues’ such as Liberty and Mt. Hood, AB was busy in Germany replacing Hallertauer MF with varieties like Hallertauer Tradition, and Spalter Select, new German aroma cultivars bred to AB’s specifications. It always made sense to AB not to be too tied to one region, or one or two varieties.”
The flight returned to normal, Bill was flat out on the deck
Our plan was simple. Get there for opening time and drink till they threw us out. Piss around for 90 minutes or so, then back to the pubs. This amazes me, but I can even remember what we did in that dead time. Walked around a bit then sat in a playground eating crisps.
Free Teleconference Call “Healing Your Relationships”
After spending time posting on the diary, the rain finally stopped and we went to the Farmer's Market. It was very windy and the merchants were holding their tents to keep them from blowing away. Despite the heavy rain earlier, all the merchants were set up for business. We purchased fresh ciabatta bread, tomatoes (can't get enough of these fresh ones), and a bouquet.
Special Award MONICA MASON contribution to dance.
our love shall tide us through
“Noon is the faerie midnight. The toadstools become a portal then. They sparkle!” Her eyes gleamed. I didn’t like that gleam. It frightened me.
Noteworthy: Brother of JD and Tim Drew, all 3 of which have the distinction of being the only siblings to each be drafted in the 1st round.
So bear with me a moment
I made this shirt for Steve to wear to my Dad's opening a few months ago. The fabric is a bed sheet and the buttons are plastic amazing square ones.
If we can, even jokingly, eliminate words or change the way a word is used... who is to judge if a word is being used correctly. Doesn't it make it all a little subjective? All this fighting over and eliminating of words has left me perplexed.
It was fun but way too stressful.
now i bring you a couple new additions to my collection: shady lady volumes 1 & 2. i found these lurking in a tjmaxx...both were only $13 USD. $13 instead of $40? i didn't have a chance in resisting...
- DIY
Both those annexes were showing signs of serious cracking, and a decision would be made early this evening about whether to demolish them, Mr Walters said. "While it's a tragedy to lose parts of a listed building, health and safety of people around it come first."
The lost girl did not stir. Christmas Eve had come and passed taking her with it.
My favorite thing this week was....Seeing my daughter in the kitchen eating breakfast "appropriately" dressed while waiting for the boys to get the fire burning in the woodstove! (It might have been a little chili when they woke up!)
Yep, still here! Funny how life can pick you up and whisk you off on a tangent from time to time. Last weekend of the School hols here, which involved a visit from my folks, visits from far away friends, lots of catching up, lots of cleaning and re-organising rooms (I can now see the floor in my boys room!) lol.
Well, every time I think you guys couldn't possibly outdo yourselves... you outdo yourselves. Your wearable, Tim Holtz-style art for GM 37 was absolutely some of the most wonderful stuff I've ever seen. What a creative community we have!!! Bravo-- times a thousand!-- to everyone who participated.
Natasha Morgan
Today's dinner was no exception. I have had a couple of kilos of carrots in the fridge for a couple of weeks now and have been lacking inspiration to cook them. Before I decided to enter the Gourmet Garden Blog Off / Cook Off competition, they were earmarked for soup. My son and I peeled them, roughly chopped them, seasoned with salt and pepper and roasted with the Gourmet Garden chunky garlic and some extra virgin olive oil.
Alphabet spaghetti and potato smash,
Now I do love Zoya's 'Adina' polish, but I thought the colours would be a little more obvious. The colours vary from a mid-purple to a light spring green, though goes virtually unnoticeable on my fingers. The consistency was fine, but the polish shows up every little fault, so I topped the tips of my nails with China Glaze's 'It's Alive!' glitter polish from their Halloween collection this year.
Well, now that I have gone in to all of that, let’s take a look at my thoughts on the actual book, shall we?
· 10.5 lb. case
Emily’s Burrata: (crushed almond pesto, red quinoa, black pepper/crème fraîche cracker) (below) vs. My Sweet Potato Dumplings (above).
Since I cannot think of a children’s character beginning with ‘X’, let’s look instead at something else that often crops up in children’s stories – the search for hidden treasure!
That kind of compelling reason is something I dearly missed in Jacques Audiard's widely praised A Prophet (2009), which, after a strong opening half hour, basically devolves into a generally unremarkable prison-survival saga, with a blank cipher of a lead character who never seems to exude much in the way of inner life. What makes its first 30 minutes so strong compared to the rest is the measure of moral suspense Audiard injects into the proceedings. In trying to make good with a ruthless Corsican mob kingpin named César Luciani (Niels Arestrup), an imprisoned French Arab named Malik (Tahar Rahim) reluctantly decides to kill an informant for him, leading to a sequence that is as brutally messy a movie killing as, say, that brilliantly agonizing murder scene in Alfred Hitchcock's Torn Curtain (1966) or, more recently, a similarly excruciating killing in Ang Lee's (highly underrated) Lust, Caution (2007). Has something snapped in Malik as far as his moral compass is concerned? Unfortunately, the rest of A Prophet seems to barely acknowledge that question, disappointingly letting that hovering morality slip away as the rest of his story drags on and on, seemingly losing a sense of purpose with every new development. Notwithstanding a handful of nifty suspense setpieces, by the end of the film, it's difficult to get a handle on why Audiard felt he needed to tell this particular story.
Bank in the total amount to one of the below accounts. You may transfer/deposit payment via Internet banking eg. M2U , ATM Machines , Cash Deposit Machines , Over the Counter or by Cheque.
I say, "What are you doing?"
2nd place – Tyler Johnson
For the filling, whip the cream with the sugar and vanilla until soft peaks form. In another bowl place all of the mascarpone cheese. Fold cream in about 3 batches into the softened mascarpone, being more gentle with each subsequent batch so you don't deflate the cream.
This was in the early 1960s when there was no vaccine for measles. Medical scientists still do not know the cause of encephalitis and there is no cure; they can treat only the symptoms. You either recover or you don’t. As a result, I feel enormous gratitude for beating the odds. I’ve gotten more than my fair share of lucky breaks in life.
Others claim that this verse says what it means and that we need to be water baptized to be saved today. While this argument takes the verse literally, and doesn’t change the meaning of the word “for,” there are still problems with this argument.
I looked up how many showers the average American takes each year. I am, apparently, grossly dirty compared to my neighbors because I only take 4 or 5 a week. The average in the USA is EIGHT. That’s right… more showers than there are days in a week. Australians take even more! (A little side note: there are some SERIOUS drought issues in Australia right now. Coincidence? Hmmm…) So, if the population of the USA is about 312,000,000 and each person saved 16 minutes per week in the shower that would be nearly 12,480,000,000 gallons of water EACH WEEK! And that’s JUST in the USA.
7. Jane's hair. I know it sound frivolous next to the others, but I just can't seem to find a line of products or even a mis-match of products that keep her hair from drying out & frizzing up by mid afternoon.
I hate that this is even a topic of conversation when I'm only 7 weeks pregnant. I wish we could just have a normal pregnancy and know that we will take this baby home, but we have to prepare for "ifs." I hope so much that I won't have any more bleeding and this pregnancy will be very successful. Please send positive thoughts our way if you can.
It’s the whole thing with Italian mothers and their sons. I said, what’s really at the bottom of this? Let’s take it to its monstrous extreme. That’s what Talia said. “I get it, Sam. You want me to be a monster. I’m a monster.”
The Path of Possibility:
Row 8: Knit 4, Purl to last 4 stitches, Knit 4
8. “Lemme just finish this round” is a lot like me saying “Lemme just finish this round of video games” fair enough
We added the Galaxy S II to the first round of tests for good measure. As you can see from the crops, in good lighting the Galaxy S III tends to produce images with more detail than both its predecessor and the HTC One X.
Lets go over the list......
The estranged wife of former NBA superstar Allen Iverson was demanding a restraining order be placed on her husband as they fight out a bitter divorce, TMZ reported Sunday.
great news: I broke away from those two and I’m on another car. I had no choice-it was that or catch another train. Now the bad part to this-besides getting trapped by more happy people-is I have no idea where to get off. I’m assuming its Dupont Circle. If I’m wrong……I’m really in deep shit.
So many strangers have now become firm friends due to the politician’s and soldier’s legacy. Bumping into men who — without being asked or seeking recompense — care for his grave, now becomes something of a reunion for Veronique.
A second possibility: proper functioning and allied notions are to be explained in terms of aptness for promoting survival, either at an individual or species level.
Reap the harvest
At this point, at the bottom of the sixth turn, each side controlled one objective. Frederick hoped for the game to end, to gain a tie. However, under the random game length rules, a die was rolled (by Kevin, a now neutral party) and the game would continue for another turn.
A weirdness: Madeline Smith plays a hysterical mute (screenwriter John Elder shamelessly plagiarising his own work on EVIL OF F), cured by a second trauma. Director Fisher made some of his best work after being hit by car during an inebriated stroll — his work on THE DEVIL RIDES OUT and FRANKENSTEIN MUST BE DESTROYED was some of the best of his career. But between those films and this one, he got drunk again, and got hit by a car again — a second trauma! – and relapsed into the more sedentary style of his early ’60s work.
The headmaster upon me
Yesterday I put in parsnips and carrots. I always put in carrots a bit on the thick side.
-Just for fun - This is the BIG shopping week! Leave us a comment and let us know if you have started shopping or if you are finished. I have not started yet, but plan on it this week and hope to be finished soon!
Agnes Parma, who is partially sighted, diabetic, clinically obese and now a wheelchair user, was informed on Wednesday (25 April) that she had just two days to move from her nursing home placement, which is funded by Hackney Council, to new accommodation that has not yet been fully adapted to cater for her physical disabilities.
GENITIVE : latin genitive ( possessive )
the knee splashing,
It was sunny and warm wheather today too, nearly all snow has disappared. Saw more butterflies, migrant robin and a frog at the cottage...
Meet "Harlequin Spam," aka, "Harley," "Doofus," "Cutie," "Idiot," and "Very Good Boy." After loaning for about 2 months we decided to take the plunge and buy him. And I have LOVED IT!!! It's SO wonderful to have my own horse again! No one else riding him (or screwing him up...only me!!). I get to ride whenever, however, and whatever I please. So we've been very focused our dressage and have had some very nice hack outs in which we didn't freak out (and by we I mean him) so things are going pretty well. Oh, there was a mishap with a trailer and he hurt himself and therefore made it so we couldn't compete in 2 shows, but it's not the end of the world, I learned. As much as I LOVE to compete, it's not the most important thing apparently. Why God chose to show me in such a dramatic way is beyond me ;)
Nipping a potential ANTM cycle ain’t easy. Really.
7. (C) Sen. Feingold asked about the GOE’s plans for stabilizing Somalia after military intervention, and wondered what kind of Somalia Meles hoped to see eventually. Would Ethiopia tolerate a unified Somalia? The application of Sharia Law? Did the GOE favor Somaliland’s independence? Meles answered that the GOE did not have the means to pursue the kind of reconstruction and reform agenda that the U.S. had pursued in Iraq. "We must tailor our agenda to our means." That agenda would be limited to 1) proving that Jihadists could not rule Somalia; and 2) redressing the current military imbalance to encourage dialogue between moderate members of the CIC and the TFG. The PM stated that although Ethiopia did not like the idea of Sharia Law, Somalis had the right to implement it. What they did not have the right to do was promote Jihadist expansionism. Meles said that the GOE had no problem with a united Somalia. He noted that Puntland favored a loose confederation, while Somaliland made an argument for independence based on the principles of espoused by the African Union. Resolving these questions was not part of Ethiopia’s agenda, however.
JW has managed to get the newly installed radar system functional, we’ve treated the galley and saloon floor with teak oil, installed lights above the outdoor table near the nav station, and I have done some nesting. Managed to put up some bits of nautical artwork around the boat, and it’s feeling both like home, and ready to move.
“I like just tapping onto the AV out of an old console. I also like manipulating the original controller as my interface,” he says. “I find it much more enjoyable than just hitting a keyboard. It’s like you’re playing the music. Tapping ‘B’ in time with the music is a lot more enjoyable than just tapping your foot. You can see it happen right before you, and sometimes you’ll end up in a venue with an enormous projector, and it’s casting it over the entire stage, and it feels great. It’s a lot of fun to do.”
I know it seems like celebrities pick these up on a whim, but if a place is advertising with a guy on the street, you might be better off just calling the police. I know you want to be like Brangie, but the babies here won’t be the quality foreign babies you’ve come to appreciate in such magazine photo shoots as ‘US Weekly’ or ‘In Touch’. Not sure what that magazine is in touch with. Definitely not reality, or ethics.
I get it. I really do. But young girls need to be aware that it takes more than a smile and starring at each other for hours to reverse years of deviant behavior. And girls are deluding themselves if they think otherwise. Some girls deliberately seek out the bad boy as a means to escape their strict, mundane lives. It’s exciting and sexy to live on the edge, which makes for a lot of passion and irrational thinking.
It was almost like they weren’t sure how big this was going to get and got caught a little surprised. Perhaps the conversation sounded a little bit like, this is getting out of control. That’s great what can we give them next.
Lucy and James have enjoyed every minute of the time they have spent with their cousins over the past week. Edward, Helen and 'baby' Eliza came in town from Kentucky for their Easter break and the kids have had some great adventures - exploring around the farm in Thibodaux, playing at Daneel Park, a trip to the zoo, lunch at Dat Dogs - they will be so sad to see them go at the end of the week.
Level 13: MP Cost: 32, Duration: 138 seconds, Defense: +65%, Abnormal Status Resistance: +39%, Elemental Resistance: +39%.
Mal was a co-judge, with me and Jenny Valentine last year when The Knife of Never Letting Go won and now he will have another go because part of the prize is to be judge next time. It's the only children's book prize judged by fellow-writers and a lovely one to win. Congratulations to Mal.
the beat of my heart
to see in that acre of nearly
I know this can be applied to all areas of life, but in my personal opinion I am disgusted at how far people will go and how nasty they become in order to get what they want! Please lets not get our industry a bad reputation. Lets treat each other with some respect, we do this job (or are training to do this job) to make people feel good about themselves lets not forget that. There is no need to backstab and be horrible to get ahead, in the end your talent and personality will always shine through if you are sincere in your heart...and its nearly christmas people, lets show some good will ;)
Pl inform all there to visit our website on daily basis
Enter Tekwan and ladle the broth into the bowl using
Dan – you suck.
I went out to lunch since my lunch hour became unexpectedly free and upon walking down a crowded sidewalk a complete stranger made eye contact with me. I tried to avert but it was too late. She said, “Hi.” I said, “I opt out,” and picked up my pace without glancing over my shoulder because I was afraid I’d knock the Buddha Man over.
To (roughly) quote Thornton Wilder: “You get a good night’s sleep, too.”
In verse 7, John comes to the purpose of his letter. False teachers are in the area, particularly antichrists who are denying that Jesus — 100% man and 100% divine — walked among us in human form. Heresy and error are easy traps in which to fall because they distort the truth. Therefore, a vulnerable listener will nod at the truthful parts then be persuaded through elaborate rhetoric towards accepting falsehood. They abound in the 21st century as they did in the 1st. The early Church was full of false prophets with ‘new’ revelations. Today’s Church is equally full of ‘new’ revelations, which this blog attempts to explore in as much depth as time allows (NPP being one of them).
I created a little Gotham-esque city scape on the side of our kitchen island using my trusty contact paper. It made for a really cute backdrop for photos. I'll post more pics of this project in progress tomorrow. It was super simple.
In Ex Parte Bohannan, the CCA denied relief because TDCJ belatedly held a "preliminary hearing" in order to moot the parolee's due process claim. The CCA agreed it was moot for him, but a concurring opinion (pdf) by Judge Michael Keasler, signed by three other judges, declared in the strongest possible language that the failure to provide preliminary hearings "violates a releasee’s constitutional rights, and our experience with this issue establishes that the Board, pursuant to the policies established by the TDCJ, Parole Division, has violated, and continues to flagrantly violate, clearly established constitutional law."
Open to: US only
He, he…
darren AT cosmicmail DOT co DOT uk
A cardinal rule of any party would be to NEVER go famished to a party. If you starve yourself throughout the day “in preparation” for the party, you’ll gourge yourself on food once you get there. You’ll have no idea how it was prepared and you’ll eat more than if you’d eaten beforehand. Sometimes it can backfire, and you’ll end up eating more calories than you would’ve the whole day if you’d just eaten responsibly throughout the day.
Time passed. And kept passing.
.under the weather
But it’s alright! I’m really, really determined to do a cover of Departures (ED1 of GC) and Euterpe (GC Insert Song). Not just a piano cover, but a vocals and piano cover.
For the benefit of all, every nation should have its own secure homeland. A world of strong and internally self-sufficient Nation-States, each free to celebrate its own culture, traditions and values, is the strongest defence against the internationalist menace. It is not racist to love one's own and to respect other nations; it is racist to seek the destruction of individual nations and their submersion into a cosmopolitan world of rootless consumer-producers. For freedom's sake, defend your nation; defend every nation. All occupations and colonisations are an affront to freedom, and all must be opposed.
Also leaked, via a fan site, is Kid Cudi’s contribution, “The Ruler and the Killer.” Cudi is the only hip hop artist on the largely rustic and bluegrass influenced soundtrack. This is one of Cudi’s more rock-influenced songs, however, and it seems ambiguously suited to a darker moment in the story, expressing the feeling of being actively in battle.
Sky Blue 2
Despite “House of Walker” being a drinking event, their food selection was also impressive. Snacks included short rib with mashed potatoes set in a flaky crust, mini crab cakes with ginger and cheese, and more. For attendees who were still hungry, two snack tables were provided with bread, fruits, and vegetables with lemon and thyme hummus, green goddess dip with crudités, and kale and feta cheese dip. The kale and feta seemed to be the most popular since it was gone before I had the chance to try it. Obviously, people don’t go to whisky tastings for the food, which now brings us to the actual private tasting.
arose, took first concern (always) has left me drained of all creativity and time.
The journal is a bit subdued, I suppose, but I love the quote I found to put on it. No idea who to credit it to. It seems a bit blurred in the picture. It says "Beauty without expression is boring."
Sharia ran back the way she had come. She knew not whether she had defeated her supposedly immortal opponent, and did not care. She was ready to feel the crimson rays of the sun on her skin, and nothing now could stop her from returning to her home, to the desert ruins of Nazerak, to the world above.
The only reason I bought this was because of the Long Shot competition. I bet it started as a great beer. but will be greatly reduced after Sam Adams gets hold of it.
SATURDAY, APRIL 21st
These markers are also elevated in XMRV+ ME patients, given the bogus name of CFS by the American CDC. A label exported around the world, used to hide human MULV infection, XMRV.
Diana rules over wild animals, hunting and the moon.
On May 24, 2010 Russ and I had our 8th anniversary and true to form the day turned out to be a bust.
Electricity also damages the nervous system which is an electro-chemical system, meaning that it uses both electrical currents and neurochemicals to transmit messages from one nerve cell to another. Damage can range from the numbness and tingling to death. But this damage can also result in the person developing epilepsy. Memory problems can develop as well.
If you don't come back to stay;
I have a very fertile imagination ,so I could think up stories and get myself upset over it. I really started getting frustrated and sad.
You cook some elbow pasta, drain and return to the pot. Then add the cheese, eggs, milk and salt and pepper, and mix. Scoop into liners. I suggest using foil liners, as the paper liners had seepage from the liquids. And bake. How easy!!!
Ace returns to the hotel after the all night vigil by Pint of Plenty’s stall. Waiting for him is Nathan Israel, and we learn that Ace is going to give Israel his marching orders today. The guys who make up Foray Stable are excited as their horse Mon Gateau is racing today. They follow Trainer Escalante and Vet Jo. Turo and Jo are having another ‘fight’ and Jo breaks off to help a woman who just got some terrible news delivered by phone. Suddenly, a flock of birds take flight, and horses start to rear up on their hind legs. Something is not right. The birds know it, the horses know it – but we don’t.
Opt For Managed Change
Jeff suggests that Crabaugh, rather than proposing a poor system, is in fact using it to critique the standard XP requirements. It's an interesting thesis and I think he's probably on to something. However, I still have a problem with Crabaugh's system and indeed most other build-your-own-character-class systems I've seen. The problem is that the system seems to assume that XP requirements are intended solely (or at least primarily) as a means of balancing the relative power of each class at first level. On this understanding, a thief takes so few XP to reach second level compared to, say, a fighter, because a thief is such a pathetic class at 1st level. Similarly, all the demihuman classes require more XP than their human-only counterparts as a way of compensating for their racial abilities.
-tag 11 new people (or you will have bad luck for 7 years)
The villains are not super, but there are a couple interesting henchmen of note. First there is this one mullet looking loser that wears spurs and kicks like a motherfucker. I've never seen that shit before, but it was pretty sweet. He could totally slice a dude up with his feet before the poor bastard knew what hit him. There was a cool little fight scene with him and JCVD that was well lit and a bit stylish that ends in a satisfying way if you find spur man's dumbass look at all annoying like I did. He has no speaking role, so I can really only comment on the man's moves and shitty attire.
Japanese porn star turned B-Movie actress Asami Suguira came to the world of pinky violence in Noboru Iguchi's films Sukeban Boy and Machine Girl, but got a meatier role in his film Robo Geisha as one of the two goblin assassins. Since then she has appeared in Yakuza Hunters, Final Death Ride Battle, Mutant Girl Squad, Helldriver and the dubiously titled Erotibot, Zombie Ass: Toilet of the Dead, and Rape Zombie: Lust of the Dead. While she appears to be Noboru Ugichi's muse, she works with other directors in the same vein.
I love that the weather is changing and we will have more reasons to sip hot chocolate and be still.
I felt his warmth shine as I danced
“As banal as it may seem, when I heard the news I immediately though of Sir Elton John singing at Princess Diana’s funeral, singing about Marilyn Monroe, to whom Smith was compared. And I thought of the point of the song, which was that candles that burn brightest burn quickest. And then I thought of breasts. Which made me hungry. And then I thought, ‘Weird, I’m thinking about breasts and Princess Di.’ And I made a sandwich, but I didn’t have chicken breast so I went with ham. And then I realized that my Joyce dissertation was becoming a distraction.”
‘Managers were initially sceptical about the wisdom of working at home and said things like ‘If we can’t see them, how can we know they are working?” Hill said.
So, in short, our environment was sacrificed for the sake of the construction boom. This new law led to many small quarries springing up overnight in the forests of the Northern Range. These quarries have affected the habitat for wild animals, our vegetation and our waterways. The quarrying also has implications for flooding on a national level.
Back at the hotel, we decided we weren’t up for our original restaurant plan which would have involved a metro ride and a longish meal; instead, we wanted something casual, relaxed, and nearby. Paris by Mouth to the rescue! We found the Breizh Cafe on both the list of top 5 places to eat crepes, and top 5 restaurants open on Sunday – and it was just blocks from our hotel. Perfect.
In the US, we have Thanksgiving holiday this week, so we decided to extend this week's challenge for 2 weeks so that everyone has a chance to play if they are traveling or playing with family---like we are! :)
One would imagine a paper trail will exist re payments being made to third parties, even for a business with such a large budget as the NotW. Is Mr Coulson’s name on any of these?
Veteran Comedienne Hope Flood, who in her 23 years in comedy on the road, stage, television, film and as an on-air radio personality, realized it takes well over a decade of work before most comedians are even recognized. Flood decided to create a solution to help more women in comedy succeed.
I am seriously in danger of agreeing with some of what David Cameron is doing. Notwithstanding the fact that he presides over a party that espouses an impossible and unrealistic moral code that they themselves can’t adhere to, he has actually done some good things in the past few months.
23. You know, girls like you give guys like me a reason to live.
38. My children and I are deeply connected.
These days, in my own work, I’m trying to strike a balance between the delights of realism (a bigger and more physical world, sensuality, verisimilitude) and those of a more exaggerative approach, an approach that comes more naturally to me and enables (in my work anyway) what feels like more ferocity and abandon, and a higher, darker type of truth. Reexamining this book has been interesting: Spirin seems able to have it both ways. He shows the (very real) scuffed boots of a musician in a Moscow regimental band, as well as a delighted-looking cat riding on the back of a nervous-looking goose riding on the back of a pig clearly beaming with pride.
554 ***D-IV/24/1965. “How to Begin to Think About Obscenity: Ends and Means.” Senate Club, Shimer College, Mount Carroll, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1972(1), above, and in Item B-2, above, pp. 117-38 (1975).)
Not really for myself but for my kids and maybe someday not very soon at all.. My future grandchildren.
Please say a prayer for our little Bennett. I'm going to call our doctor tomorrow to see if I can get any more information, but with anything else that involves the Army, I know it's not gonna be an easy task!
The Institutes's adverse weather policy can be summed up as "Go home in the full knowledge that we disapprove and might not pay you later".This policy was self evidently not working. The Institute might have had a full house of staff, but no one was working. The Great Snow Disaster of last year is still fresh in our collective memory. We all know people who spent the night in cars in the snow, or six hours getting home in snowstorms (me).
Research authors at the Melbourne Institute of Applied Economic and Social Research, University of Melbourne, looked at the most recent data from 48 countries and territories across 20 different measures. The measures are grouped under four headings: resources (investment by government and private sector), output (research and its impact, as well as the production of an educated workforce which meets labour market needs), connectivity (international networks and collaboration which protects a system against insularity) and environment (government policy and regulation, diversity and participation opportunities). It also takes population size into account and produces some interesting results.
Next Up - Confirmed
Country pumpkin Raelynn went very safe with her song choice, picking The Band Perry (guess which song?) and Erin chose Proud Mary… I’m sure Blakes heart was breaking, because deep down based ont he performances, the country sweetie pie was definitely the weaker of the two. But, she IS the most commercial. He went with the more powerful singer, and chose Erin Willett. He also knows that RaeLynn will emerge as a budding country phenom with one phone call…and he’ll make it.
Look at those prices! Totally affordable, right???
- Post the award on my blog.
“Yes?” she inquires with a wide knowing smile, “May I help you?”
Amy is YET ANOTHER blogger turned nail polish creator. She opened her Etsy shop recently, and I was lucky enough to catch her grand opening. Oh my. I have never seen such nail polish insanity! Most indies eventually build up an audience large enough that their shops sell out quickly, but on her grand opening she sold out in five minutes. FIVE minutes! I sadly was not able to grab Floam, or the others I had hoped for.
of Casa de Giulietta
It makes me realise the delicious pleasure of the moon
Jamie and I had a fun "Commercial Bowl" party. We weren't into the football but we love the commercials ( my favorite was the Mayan end of the world commercial ) We did have a platter of food to enjoy though:
Detroit Free Press
A woman returns to China to be by her father’s side after she learns that he has been diagnosed with stomach cancer. (2/10)
¼ cup smooth peanut butter
The children's education is carrying on ok, though we do seem to be having quite a few 'days off' which I want to put right as soon as possible. Halleluiah for Mathletics and Conquer Maths and Reading Eggs and Brain Pop and all those other educational websites that I plonk the children down in front of. The children do actually enjoy working on these sites though and while I don't want them to replace the other, more conventional kinds of learning, at least I know we're not slipping behind. Rosie is taking her Grade Four piano exam next week and although she is very cool about this, she doesn't think she wants to take any more piano exams after this one. I can understand that, it certainly feels that she has spent weeks perfecting two or three pieces, ready for the exam, rather than moving on to other tunes and just enjoying playing. That's what it was all about when she first started taking lessons and I don't want something pleasurable to turn into a chore just for the sake of a certificate. She's been very willing to do the piano exams up to now and it hasn't seemed such a big deal, but this year, she seems a bit bogged down with all the fussy little details that the examiner will mark her down for. Time to call time on exams I think and just enjoy playing as much as we enjoy listening to her playing.
The thing is, the record that came with it (LK 094) doesn't match. This might've been a source of eternal lament if the mismatched record wasn't itself such a pearl. To get the real scoop on these, I sought the expert counsel of my good pal Peter over at monrakplengthai. Enormous thanks, man. Knowing the deal makes this artwork even stranger. Check it:
OK, coming soon to a blog near you....
It takes just 2 minutes and you will save thousands of humans!
Ecclesiastes 4:9-10 reminds us about the value of friendship
a word-perfect a beautiful scene
There has been dabbling in a bit of marketing consultancy, which I’ve not done for a while, but which I am very much enjoying – the focus being on using online platforms for the widest reach.
Ever found yourself walking around Suntec City or Vivocity carpark looking for your car? Simply snap the carpark landmark/ lot number instead of trying to remember them.
Life would be so boring for anyone wanting to live like Ann Romney when the biggest decision she has to make in a given day is, “Gee, which Cadillac do I want to drive today?”
"You must never go down to the end of the town,
In the best pugilistic traditions, the end of the contest was marked by the drinking of many pints of beer by contestants and audience alike and the serving of sausage rolls and home made Morrocan spiced lamb sausage by Sue. Readers of my Sepia Saturday post might like to note the recycled Quality Street tin.
One thing I remember most about Peggy is that when one of her girlfriends would call her, she would say, “I’d be happy to come over, if you don’t mind me bringing Marilyn’s kids.” She might have complained that this babysitting gig was keeping her from having a life of her own, or she might have just left and abandoned us to our own devices. But she found ways to include us, even in her girlfriend times.
A strange unheard of thing occurred
No...the wedgie that needs picking is either their undies are getting smaller or my butt is getting bigger! I know. I know. This sounds like a personal problem.
We, the New York City General Assembly occupying Wall Street in Liberty Square, urge you to assert your power.
Christians need to recognize the opportunity present in the Harry Potter series. The world is crying. We need to hear, to genuinely listen to the love expressed for the boy, Harry Potter. He is a counterfeit, for sure. But the fact that people flock to see him and his friends as they battle evil together is proof enough that the call to evangelize the world is not dead and bygone. The call is alive; the need is real.
D'abord j'ai tamponné la fée du set Wishes, je l'ai installée sur un lit de fleurs fait avec deux fleurs différentes venant du set Believe, puis j'ai ajouté nuages et coin qui sont du set Grow. Papiers BoBunny, perfo Martha Stewart et un joli coin Delicate Corner de Make it Crafty.
Author Shoes is an exquisite vintage shoe shop based near the London Wall. When I arrived at their launch party, which had a twenties theme, I was taken aback by the beautiful old facade of the building, which I later found out was built in 1864. The building has barely changed, inside or outside, since then, with the wooden floors and windows having survived two world wars.
There were also 4 baby geese! I was so surprised their color is actually a bright yellow when they are babies! And the mom and dad were teaching them how to eat, what to eat… it was so cute to see their family. I tried taking a picture, but I only had my camera phone. Tomorrow I’m taking my big camera and I’m going to try and get some nice pictures to share!!
at Christmastime.
The name of the blond Belgian ale is taken from the title of a book by philosopher Francis Fukuyama, "The End of History and the Last Man" which the company said had been chosen to imply "this is to beer what democracy is to history."
In the serene night,
When I pick her up at 3.15pm, The Tomboy is always looking rather peaky but strangely seems to be quite vigorous in her movements. I say "Did you do a wee today? Do you need a wee?" and she always shakes her head.
However even if this is a tale with a happy ending, there are many adopted children who do not share the same story. Some women never told a soul and when contacted, their children were told they could not possibly see them. The lies were too deep even now, they could not tell anyone the truth, it would break them apart. This is a valid part of history that cannot be forgotten we must learn as a younger generation from these poor women and children’s stories and make sure that it never happens again.
With that in mind...
· Extortion and blackmail, features of the Mexican landscape, are also permissible in Islam.
James 1:22 But don’t just listen to God’s word. You must do what it says. Otherwise, you are only fooling yourselves.
if and when you are in rome, it is well worth a visit. especially if it’s a lovely sunny day
Like a kid in school, I see the clock and I'm counting the minutes until my release from this frigid hell. Somewhere, there is a cup of coffee with my name on it. And tonight, I'm thinking I will splurge on a six pack (which will probably wind up being used primarily for brats) and curling up with a good movie. On second thought, I have to get my backside back on track and keep my date with Jillian. Damn her!
They say “I don’t understand”. People who’ve known me for 11 years or people who I’ve just met all say “I don’t really understand you” (laughs).
I would encourage you to take a look at the beginning of Romans 6 as we enter today’s article.
The only other doctor that we saw new this month was her a nephrologist (kidney specialist). We decided that we didn't want to see our urologist (because of difference of opinions) so we needed to see someone. Her nephrologist was referred to us by her pediatrician. As we will find out in the months to come it was truly God who guided us to see this doctor. There isn't much else to say about this appointment, at the time being, but I will definitely be talking about her again.
There are many gamsat books on the market already and for the prospective student choosing the right one can be a difficult task. With so much choice and so little objective information about them it is little wonder that internet forums are packed with questions from confused gamsat candidates asking which one to buy and how they should prepare for the gamsat test. The market is definitely saturated and for most prospective gamsat candidates it can be really difficult distinguishing between all the books available. And let’s be honest, the gamsat test is one of the hardest selection tests ever invented. Compared to other such selection tests, most of them seem like a doddle compared to gamsat. The only exception being the MCAT test which is used in the USA and which is equally hard as the gamsat test if not even harder. This brings us neatly to the question as to which gamsat test preparation book to recommend to potential gamsat candidates. This is really a hard question.
you will get a lovely mystery prize from me. Just email me
the other girl, who realize bout it..then, knew bout the camera…her brother installed the camera…quite a lot…n one of them, is in her room..that was both of the girls room…where they make love..she’s quite mad…
The title was originally "Perfectly Pia," which was deemed too "chick-lit." And I agreed. So the folks over at Razorbill brainstormed and I brainstormed and we just threw ideas back and forth. We came up with some great titles, but there was always some little thing that was wrong -usually they were too close to something already out there. It was my editor who suggested it ultimately, and we all loved it.
Hi folks, here's a cheery project combining the Lace Fragments stamp plate and the Haberdashery stamp plate. I used a colour palette of Spun Sugar Distress Ink and Paris Dusk Memento Ink, a very unusual combination for me!
Real fairy tale critics and academics may find fault with this, but that's how I understand it at least.
- The Prince Edward Island Command of The Royal Canadian Legion Bursary
Toward the end, with 30 min. remaining, we broke out some games- heart beat and pulse- which always boost morale. It was student led, which always makes me feel good. We took our tests, and then it was on to fly high friday, which is what we call our half day of classes, followed by a school culture building activity. Sometimes the classes act together and sometimes we break off. The Alpha Kings (a self moniker for the 8th grade boys, which sounds more like a gang than an academic fraternity) wanted to play football in the rain. I let them. Even played with them, and no one got hurt.
Jethro Tull
Ballroom Battle: Searching for the next great ballroom couple
Dec 5th – just left the mall in Kampala. We had to get a new kettle to boil our tea and shower water. I am feeding George sour cream & onion potato chips while he drives us back home. It's his 1st time having them :) I LOVE hearing him talk to the traffic!!! Bahahaha!
Republicnas -
Back to the topic at hand. Greyrat stated that he could produce a doorway into the room that had Fario in it. We all agreed and got ready. He then mentally produc…ah gods damn it. We teleported into the sodding room where we caught the woman by surprise and convinced her at my sword point that it was a good idea to surrender which she was all to happy to agree to.
and she puts on something else,
(Acting) REGIONAL HEAD: CORPORATE SERVICES: WESTERN CAPE
We can't get the chance,
No-one saw her , she stood alone
But Mr. Suzuki now feels a sense of bitter defeat. When I suggested that the environmental movement has reached a dead end, he said: “I absolutely agree.” The federal government is hostile, and environmental agendas are being rolled back everywhere. Barack Obama may have cancelled the Keystone oil pipeline for now (or, at any rate, the bit that crosses the border), but he’s also expressed an enthusiasm for new drilling that’s positively Sarah Palinesque. In Europe, governments are ditching their commitments to green energy as their economies tank. Hopes for a global climate treaty are dead. In retrospect, Mr. Suzuki says the whole idea was folly. “Copenhagen was trying to deal with something that didn’t belong to anybody – the atmosphere – through the lenses of borders, which the air doesn’t care about, and the economic interests of 192 countries,” he says. “We were trying to force nature into our agenda.”
Gavin
Tony has a daughter, Daisy, but he didn’t live with Daisy. Because he devorsed with her mother. Tony can meet Daisy very often so he felt sad.
In my obsessive-perfectionsist mind, since it wasn't PERFECT, I didn't want to add it onto the blog. But then, I couldn't move forward until I added it. Endless cycle on the hamster wheel.
2) Spend less time caring about celebrity scandals and "news". Oh, wait. What's less than zero? Okay, so, scratch that one, then.
Speaking of shoes, I went through the box and the tote of shoes and decided on a number of them to get rid of. I probably got rid of, oh, I'd say 15-20 pairs of shoes. Yeah. See why it was driving me insane? I still have quite a few pairs left to deal with as well, but it's much better than it was. I don't have room for them on the floor in the closet, I don't want them by the front door - it gets too cluttered too quickly there and just doesn't look appealing when you walk in. So, now I have to figure out what to do with them all. I have the idea of maybe having the kids store their shoes on the floor of their closets or just under their beds in their rooms, but I don't know. I think that they are more likely to get lost by doing that, so I will be looking for alternative ideas yet.
A Carrot Dragonfly Barrette
Opinion: As someone who strives to please people and likes to be given clear instructions on what to do, I have always been intrigued by the BDSM lifestyle. The Story of Em, which I started writing for 50k weekend, follows a similar storyline to the one found in Fifty Shades, which is part of why I was so drawn to this story. I wanted to see how similar it was to my own story.
Tita Maggie’s voice startled during the brief phone conversation. After the call, she broke down. The news sucked the air out of my brain: Manny and Butch’s father, the great Don Hilario Ziálcita y Legarda of the Academia Filipina de la Lengua Española (RAE), was dead. He was to turn 98 this year.
** To non-Brit readers, that's a technical term for the bricks 'twixt you and the neighbours. Not a wall covered in lurex, Twister mats and balloons.
Teeth enclosed upon your pulse,
She has gained almost 3,000 followers in four days, a number of whom were angry when she said she wasn't going to tweet everything on day one "because … they accused me of censorship".
This Google group is associated with the Virtual High School Meanderings blog (see http://virtualschooling.wordpress.com/ ). Its primary purpose is to create an e-mail based monthly newsletter that would compliment/support the content on the Virtual School Meanderings blog.
The post got out amongst the gifted community (as things do in this electronic world). Rebuking was swift, direct, and well written (as you would expect). I was already a fan of Jen at Laughing at Chaos, but I am close to adoration after her well-thought-out response. If you search hard, you can find my response in amongst the 223 comments.
What is it with comedy shows that attracts fatties, bogans and people wearing leopard-print coats?
but it looks vintage.
-Skulls of the Shogun: So basically 4-player ghost-skeleton chess, but the movement rules seem more like Warhammer? Like, you get units at the start, you move them about in a certain circle radius, you fight other units, first to kill the general wins. After that there are tons of other minor and major tactical considerations, but the most important part is that it’s a super nifty board game essentially, with up to 4 players on one screen. Good times with good friends killing undead samurai.
Joyce, my blogging friend From This Side of the Pond, wrote extremely eloquently about the joys and complexities of trying to parent a child who has turned into an adult. One of the problems is that, when our adult children are not yet parents, they have no idea how difficult this job is for us. Perhaps we've made it look so easy, that they don't realize the struggle we have trying to figure out the right way to handle each situation that comes up. I've tried to explain this to our oldest son, who is twenty-two, but I'm not nearly as eloquent as Joyce is. Nor am I as refined. So my explanations follow something along the lines of this--
It just goes to show how much the camera can lie as I don't look that ill in the picture.
The truth behind the person
(This is what happens when I get busy trying to earn a living and don’t check the NRC Event Reports every day.)
1. PCIe SSD as server cache or storage
140g cold butter, diced (9 3/4 TBS)
Let me start off talking about the massive amount of pizza that I ate in Italy; I work in a pizza place here in the US, so I eat a lot of pizza, and I’m not really a huge pizza fan, but Oh. My. Goodness. The pizza in Italy was heavenly!
Here it goes:
No wait, that's Auntie Mame, sorry.
"One point in the LGPS presentation in particular got members' backs up: 'Most members don't want more industrial action at this stage'. Of course no one wants to strike for the sake of it, but most workers understand that we have to fight to save our pensions and further strike action is necessary if we are to win. It was pointed out that members had understood on N30 that a single day wasn't going to win the campaign and had voted for action in the expectation of further escalated action. One branch has had two stewards' meetings since N30 (one today) and at both resolutions for further action on at least the same scale as November, were overwhelmingly passed. There is definitely no mood for selective action on the grounds of the division that would be caused and agreement that if there is to be future action then it should be national and united. The national official, said that he wouldn't have put that in if he had written the presentation himself but that statement is now part of an official UNISON statement sent to all LGPS branches in Wales. It was repeatedly stressed that this is not a deal and that the ballot remains live and that we can still take action months down the line.
She started from the corner where she sat. Scanning the area she started picking up the scene and her imagination started filling in the gaps of what must have happened.
I bought this skirt at anthropologie and I love the clothes that they sell but I'm probably going to be avoiding them for political reasons even though I'm not from the USA. I don't want my money going to help fund Rick Santorum's bid for the presidency.
He claimed that he had put the item in his pocket and forgotten it when he went to the cashier.
What it has done though is brought to light things (decisions) that I need to get taken care off. I've started to talk about the "important" stuff to the "mundane" stuff... I find that if I can start talking about them whether it's to strangers or the most important people to me it makes it easier to talk about them over and over again.
What sorts of courses are taught by these Group of 88/clarifying faculty, people hired by a professor who argues that composition courses should be designed “to teach students to write as critics of their culture”? Below is a sample of classes taught by UWP faculty who signed anti-lacrosse petitions:
No need to be shy, you really are! All your friends left you, including your girlfriend/boyfriend and your parents disowned you. Why? Because you're fat! Fat! Fat! Don't worry though, I do feel pity for you and I understand the suffering caused by the people that can't understand you and make fun of you all day. Yes, you big ball of lard, I care for you. That's why I'm going to present you this offer. It's simple, it's cheap, and you'll lose weight in no time (or you'll be dead, in which case you can't possibly sue our company). How, you ask? It's simple!
Yup, I've thrown out some pretty audacious goals out there. A 1:50 half marathon for this year's goals? Crazzzzy. A 50 minute 10K? Insane-o. But you know what? I'd rather put it out there, try and fail than not try at all.
Friedman JM. Teratologen update: anesthetic agent. Teratology 1988; 37: 69-77.
Cheers to all hope you enjoy the info, cheers to Farmgal for making the original post. I do believe that the way of commercial agriculture is unsustainable, the way of normal farms are unsustainable, the future relies on these emerging methods.;
A lot of them said, “Hey, I think that’s a good idea. We want to be heroes again. We don’t want to be the bad guys.”
These little darling hand warmers make fantastic little Valentines Day gifts for your kids and your kids teachers...and with the felt being a quarter a sheet...pretty inexpensive too!
Sitting outside, listening to the breeze rustle through the trees and my girls laugh and sing together in the sandbox (I'm just ignoring the occasional yell or threat from embry when Nola steps in her wet sand).
Auditory = 33
What I should have said was "C'est possible de la monter pour moi"
Snowflakes keep fallin' on my head
“Quick!” I shout at Mr Young. “We have to go to the Co-Op and buy emergency cakes!”
Contact Information
Date(s): Sunday, May 6, 2012 7:30 AM to 11 AM Burlington High School
50K, 20M, 10M Trail Runs
When asked about if the singer would be given a potential return to The X Factor, he added: “She could be a panelist again if she wanted to – 100 per cent.
*EMO-tions: EarthWindFire Outfit (Group – L$0)
He writes:
As I started sketching out ideas I came up with the image of a bird. I use a lot of birds in my work and I think it's because for me they symbolize both life and death. So a bird is perfect since to me it represents two opposites that are true simultaneously.
Zinnerman helps a broken boy put himself back together at his lowest moment with the rough and threadbare love of a father who has lost everything. In return, Banagher saves Suberoa’s heart from falling into darkness and losing himself to vengeance at the battle of Torrington. Sometimes a son’s role is to fight their father when they are wrong. We spend so much time trying to catch up to our dad’s backs that we forget that they are fallible men as well. I don’t believe we become men until we have learned to stand up to our fathers when we must, and still love them as we fight, just as they do for us. Fists, sometimes, are a man’s romance.
All this political nonsense has my brain reeling too. I don't know whether to pay attention, get angry, organize, protest, and rage rage rage, or turn it all off and just try to live my life and vote how I should when I can. When I was in college, I was the former. I was angry all the time and the tiniest injustices would cause me to go into a tailspin. I felt like a madwoman sometimes, but I was single and had madwomen friends, so it felt like it was what I was supposed to do. When I met my husband, I slowly but surely settled down. Different things became important. I found myself feeling actually contented with my life, and I stopped paying attention to all the little irritants in the world and just lived my life.
*Acceptance
Anti-anti-Semites on both the left and right, on the other hand, are very powerful and very committed to shouting and shutting down anyone who has a less-than-hagiographic view of the Jews. Anti-anti-Semitism is bolstered beyond the usual minority-loving anti-racist whinging by the semi-unique instance of the Holocaust. Liberals and neocons have spent the past sixty plus years constantly picking at that Holocaust wound in one of the biggest and most ignored examples of scar worship in Western society. The Holocaust cult is so powerful that an entire European nation isÂ forced to self-flagellate constantly for a crime that the majority of its inhabitants had no role in. And anyone who questions the influence Jews have on modern society gets a roundhouse kick in the face from the Foxman-Schlussel-Victimologist crowd: “OMIGOD YOU FILTHY NEO-NAZI SCUM YOU WANT TO STUFF JEWS IN OVENS YOU AWFUL PERSON YOU!”
Lilly: Get off the grift, Roy.
Obama: Who is alone?
Pineapple/Pineapple Juice – This is a remedy that tastes soo good. Pineapple contains bromelin, bromelin is an anti-inflammatory. It fights infections and kills bacteria. You can drink fresh pineapple juice to sooth a sore throat and it will help expel mucous for you. I like to take my pineapple and blend it with my tea and honey. A good drink no matter what. Taking pineapple to treat a cold or cough is a time honored tradition in Aruyvedic Medicine, not only does it deliver vitamin C but since the bromelin is a potent anti- inflammatory it helps in treating all the inflammatory symptoms that arise from the common cold.
Given Mr. Conte’s resume, I would say he should know a little something about the drug issues within the sport of track and field. After all, I’m sure these are not the only athletes that either first or second hand used or gained knowledge from the products that he distributed. Besides, when you reach the forefront of your field, as Conte did in developing his undetectable products, you gain lots of “friends” and develop quite a network within the industry. So I would imagine that Conte’s “inside” knowledge is rather considerable.
I don't have a good eye, and my camera is an ancient Kodak digital (I swear I get better photos with my iPhone!) But a promise is a promise, so here goes.
And I believe our logic went something along the lines of "Duhh. Of course we must try gelato in Bologna."
Maybe you're wondering why a sweet little brother for the boys would be a close call?
Nonetheless, it might be argued that because no human sees the cats’ meeting or hear their revolutionary call, that it might all be a matter of perspective and a way of anthropomorphizing feline behaviour.
“Y’ha-nthlei!”
In the end, gaping at my own susceptibility, I had to come up with a theory as to why there were so many, and why that was just fine. So I considered the character of these men and discovered a common thread (or seven…). To warrant my attention, a book man must be:
Then they'd be walking and the next thing was "Can't wait for them to start talking properly, to hear their voices".
Canadian electro-pop trio Dragonette had several successful performances at Coachella, receiving praise from SPIN & Billboard.biz to Chinashop Magazine. Recently winning a JUNO Award for their infectious hit “Hello,” front woman Martina Sorbara joined collaborator Martin Solveig for a special performance of the song during his set the second weekend of the festival.
-Your email address
The choice of images in the slides is curious. For Mississippi, we get a view of a lovely wooded area. For Georgia, we are offered a street scene of Atlanta, including the historic Fox Theater.
no one is perfect EXCEPT FOR JESUS
"A recent study reported that people who use indoor tanning beds frequently are 74 percent more likely to develop melanoma, and we know young women are more likely to use them than young men," Dr. Brewer says. Despite abundant information about the dangers of tanning beds, he adds, young women continue to use them. "The results of this study emphasize the importance of active interventions to decrease risk factors for skin cancer and, in particular, to continue to alert young women that indoor tanning has carcinogenic effects that increase the risk of melanoma."
(I may have had a few)
never seem to force you to take information for granted.
Thankfully Sir Jimmy's back to tell us they were The Brothers, who I seem to remember having been on a few weeks ago, although I'm sure they seemed like a totally different group of people back then.
Challenges-------
In the same Bolden speech, one learns that Dr. John Holdren provides co-guidance to NASA relative to President Obama’s “evolving vision for space exploration.” Holdren is Obama’s Science and Technology “czar” and a longtime proponent of “de-developing” the United States and the rest of the West, redistributing wealth both within and among nations, developing the Third World with that transferred wealth… and reckoning with sea levels worldwide rising by 13 feet.
Lastly fold in berries.
And experience, a form of life that we can only earn.
3) Next Tuesday is the Republican primary in Tennessee. Which means, right now, we're getting inundated with political ads. I saw one for Newt Gingrich the other day and my only thought was, "he's still in the race? For real?" I'm not registered to vote Republican so I won't be voting in this one but, mayne, I'm hoping Mitt Romney pulls it out and goes ahead and gets the nomination. I'm sure he's just as much of an assface as all politicians and I doubt I'll vote for him in November but Rick Santorum scares the you-know-what outta me! I like the prospective of "President Romney" much more than "President Santorum" though I have a feeling, much to chagrin of 3/4 of my Facebook feed (I'm from the super conservative south, ya'll) that we'll have another four years with the Big O.
this family of eagles would have on my life----I never
Why do people run? I have friends that run, and they tell me that while running, your body produces complex chemicals called endorphins which give you a sense of well-being and euphoria. They claim that there is nothing like what’s called a runner’s high. Well, I have something growing on my window sill, and it’s done a pretty good job of giving me an incredible high, without all the aches and pains. I know what you’re thinking, but its okay. I’m in California now, and some guy in a white lab coat just wrote me a prescription for medical marijuana.
Rothschild biographer Derek Wilson says the family was the official European banker to the US government via the Federal Reserve-precursor Bank of the United States. Family biographer Niall Ferguson notes a “substantial and unexplained gap” in Rothschild correspondence from 1854-1860. He says all copies of outgoing letters written by the London Rothschilds during this Civil War period “were destroyed at the orders of successive partners”.
Recently my students explained chibchombianos to me. As I suspected, it’s not the most politically correct terminology in the dialect. Chibchombianos, I was told, are those uncultured and uncivilized people on Transmilenio. They are people that are resistant to change. They are people that, according to my students definition, don’t value their own country, throw garbage all over Bogotá and refuse to get out of the way when you’re trying to get off the bus.
Crepes, Amy? Really? That's like...French and crap.
Yes, he would be asking to meet the soldiers who fired the fatal artillery rounds - "fat chance of that", another UN soldier said as he listened to all this - and with that, Van Kappen, an immense figure in his steel flak jacket and huge helmet clanked out of the compound with a colonel from the Royal Engineers.
These tips might seem simple and can prove to be tough on the first few tries but if done on a regular basis you’ll be able to see results soon enough.
In this story, Cole careens and propels his characters through space. The wheels of cars and the feet of people rarely touch the ground as they speed from locations to location, sometimes even breaking through the panel borders! On page four, even a sound effect breaks through the panel!
Jay: I can't believe I just made a geometry reference.
It feels like I haven't been around for such a long time and I really have missed you!
- Having an organized 'everything'
2010.07.25 Pakistan Khyber 2 0 Mujahideen pull two occupants out of a vehicle and shoot them in the back of the head.
Hospitals: From early in church history, members and leaders recognized the importance of meeting the physical needs of members, as well as spiritual needs. In this spirit, fifteen hospitals were built and operated by the church. In 1974, the church decided it could better provide for its members by divesting itself of the hospitals.
After several laps he slowed down to a trot. I figured he had gotten the most of it out of his system. He settled in and started to work nicely. He didn't look tired at all, just cruised around effortlessly and slowed into a nice steady pace.
Let’s talk about the dancing!
“You’re welcome, Mrs. Archer.”
You give off great vibes, have a nice aura, and I like your style.
“This is a rare opportunity for both parties to come together and choose a path where we stop putting so much debt on our credit card,” Mr. Obama said…. – NYT, 7-22-11
How can they give vote totals to reporters, but not the state elections dept?
Multiple sources claim that US uses 100 quadrillion BTUs. This is equivalent to a consumption rate of 3.3 TW. Of course, the majority of this energy is derived from fossil fuels (as most energy everywhere is). In 2005, it was estimated that 40% of the nation’s energy came from petroleum, 23% from coal, and 23% from natural gas. The remaining 14% was supplied by nuclear power, hydroelectric dams, and miscellaneous renewable energy sources (Comparing Energy Consumption to GDP Per Capita).
Lied to us, blinded, they slaved us, misplaced us, strengthen us, hardened us then
BOARDWALK EMPIRE (HBO)
So a few years ago she started her own business and workshop.
By no means defy
This song as good as it’s, was a HUGE pain to translate, I know that the part about the macaroni hole is almost nonsensical but the original is very clear about that phrase.
Time for another of my destination wish list to come up and we are still in Asia. This time it’s Seoul, South Korea that gets the spotlight and it’s also very well-deserved.
However, financials stocks, which account for about a third of the index, performed well. This sector gained 10.99% as banks worldwide saw better performance on easing worries about financial system health and Canada’s banks continued to report healthy profits. Other strong performers included the health care and consumer discretionary sectors.
Rev. Fletcher is the Founder & President of Joy to the World Ministries International (www.jtwministries.org). He was born and raised in Malawi. His father, Rev. R.A. Matandika, is a Minister in the Nkhoma Synod of the Church of Central Africa Presbyterian (CCAP). Fletcher graduated from the African Bible College (www.africanbiblecolleges.org), with a Bachelor of Arts degree in Biblical Studies and a Minor in Communications in 2002. In April of 1999, when he was in his second year of college, he responded to God’s call upon his life and founded the Ministry of Hope (www.ministryofhope.org), a Christian ministry that cares for orphan children. In 2008, Fletcher graduated from Westminster Seminary in California (www.wscal.edu), where he earned a Master of Divinity degree. He is currently serving as the pastor of the New Westminster Chapel (www.newwestminsterchapel.org), a congregation of the Associated Presbyterian Church (www.apchurches.org), based in New Westminster (a suburb of Vancouver), in the province of British Columbia, Canada. Fletcher is married to Angella and they have a newly born daughter named Kahra Elizabeth.
Love has been a windy road for me, but I’m so proud and honored to have such a wonderful man in my life who I can count on in every way, who knows and loves all of me despite my imperfections, and whose determination and humor amaze and amuse me daily.
So if there are any ladies who would love to answer these take a stab at it...here are some I'd like to see their answers to...
Over three hours of entertainment and I didn't spend a dime. I guess I should kick a sawbuck to the organizers, BOOK-A-FRIEND.
I will keep on writing more as soon as I find some time, now I have to get ready to catch my plane to Tokyo.
It's harder in Seattle. In Paris I wrote primarily about French people, none of whom were ever going to read what I wrote. Here I'm writing about people who know about the blog and sometimes even read it if they are trapped in a small space with nothing else to do.
figures in passion stances
Neve Designs is a company that I am proud to showcase because their fabrics and materials are all natural, their clothing is made in the great state of Colorado and their quality is impeccable. Just wearing the sweater brings a bit of the Rocky Mountain beauty to me.
Endgame 2
I look now at my friends getting married, my friends having babies, my friends dating exes they had once written off and I just wonder, how did you know? Did it take more than one date? Did you ever think it could never work for you? Could you wait until he called you back or did you hold onto your phone like one grasps monkey bars in childhood? Did you know you wanted to look into their eyes forever, hear their voice for always or did you have to distort it to accept it at first in your mind? Did you fantasize right away or did you run screaming before you see things clearly in the closer-than-it-appears mirror of self-reflection? What were the right jokes and right moves and the right time to kiss and was it right because it was simply all wrong? The facebook albums flooding my newsfeed, full of white dresses and tuxed best men, show me one endpoint and I wonder, could they articulate the beginning?
20.” Our government will have the appearance of a paternal patriarchal guardianship on the part of our ruled.
Asking for a non-stress test
2 C. shredded mozzarella
Jonah Hex V2 #6 Jun 2006
(The tableau unfreezes.)
So now I had some plants growing up from my compost. I often did not know what they were, and neither did the nursery man.
When I was younger May Day confused me, and I’ll bet it still confuses some people, what with so many disparate occasions marking the date for so many wildly different reasons. I had a vague sense it was something political, but then I’d see things like the English royalty in the movie Camelot cavorting in fields of flowers—a far cry from those newsreels of Communist displays of power, or even of American workers marching through Cooper Square in New York City. According to an article on Information Please
1/2 oz fresh yeast (that is two packets)
I was just beginning my doctoral program when I had the opportunity to stand in the lunch line next to F. F. Bruce. It was in 1973, at the twenty-fifth annual meeting of the Evangelical Theological Society. Professor Bruce asked me what I was working on. I said that I was doing my dissertation on Hebrews 7:1-25. He told me that he had just had a student (Bruce Demarest) complete a dissertation on the history of the interpretation of that chapter. One of my doctoral exams was on this very subject! When I had that conversation with Professor Bruce, I never dreamed that I would have the honor of producing the commentary on Hebrews that would replace his classic volume in the NICNT. I am humbled by the privilege that has been given me.
10 Tension
Lemur are quite the cuties from Madagascar with great jumping ability. The Lemur used in the show was very engaging as it pulled on it's leash to bring the trianer closer rather doing his leaps from post to post.
We're genuinely chuffed to see such thoughtful coverage of craft beer in a mainstream press.
To make matters worse, students at the academy start turning up catatonic, and accusations fly—against Molly. The only way out of this mess? To go through hell. Literally.
And the answer to the second part of the question is: it felt AMAZING to get that representation - from someone I’d been so nervous about (because I thought he was way out of my league) that I hadn’t even had the guts to query him when I first started searching! And the night that he called to tell me that two different publishers were offering on my book…well, that was one of the best nights of my life.
Our Man In Paris
Once the putty knife was behind the chair rail, we used a crow bar to slowly start prying off the chair rail. You definitely want to do this slow if you want to do as little damage to the wall as possible This took us quite a while as we tried to be careful so that we wouldn't be left with a bunch of huge holes in the wall.
Above is the poster for the Residency at the Launchpad. Note the date of the first show: JANUARY 8. Yes, in January, the Hoover Dam is bringing its own storm to NYC. With a spot in grand opening show of The Sapphire Lounge and the opening of our own monthly residency at the Launchpad, the HDC is starting off this new year with momentum that will carry it through the next 12 months.
Rakyat wanted to forgive. But, ‘Tuan-tuan dan Puan-puan’ must allow us to do so.
All of the charts are posted on the Sea Ice Page for all to see. Northern Sea Ice went on the downward curve on its cycle with the bottom coming in 2007. Now the ice trend is curving back up just as cycles do.
"Have you ever wanted... an endless night?
-walk the dogs--I have to get better about this!
The investigation will cover the following:
I was planning on sleeping in this morning.
Jared: The brother of the brother of Jared.
The U.S. Supreme Court is considering a case brought by a group of Nigerians seeking damages under the statute, claiming Royal Dutch Shell Plc (RDSA) helped their government commit torture and murders in the early 1990s. The company argued that corporations can’t be sued under the law. Four federal appeals courts have permitted corporations to be sued under the Alien Tort Statute, the Nigerians argued.
And I cried. For a long time. Because I still miss him after all of these years and because leaving this home is so painful and because it just felt so good to let everything out and not have to put a smile on it because little people are watching me. I just let it all out and it was a relief.
Transfer the blackened poblanos to a resealable plastic bag and seal the bag. Set it aside for 15 minutes, then remove the chiles. Peel them (the skin should rub off pretty easily), then finely chop them, discarding the seeds and membranes.
If you start with one, start with the Daily 5-- it explicitly tells you how to setup your classroom, gives helpful management strategies, introductory lessons, and more.
If you see a buck lip curling he is more then likely hot on the trail of a hot does and he trying to determine the source of the scent he is following. This buck wont be around for long so you will have to make a decision to take him rather quickly.
when i think of these past few months, oftentimes i feel only the drum-tight pain of my mother’s death; the hollowness of a wedding cancelled; the gut-wrenching sadness of losing my puppy; and recently, the stress and panic of not only a major surgery, but the implications it will have on my life and my recovery.
In running and in life, comparing yourself to others doesn't bring happiness. As a runner, if you play the "comparing game" there will always be somebody running more miles than you. There will always be somebody running faster. There will always be somebody running more races. There will always be somebody doing tougher workouts. There will always be somebody thinner and in better shape. There will always be somebody who in your mind can be seen as "better" than you for whatever reason. And on the flip side, you will always be "the somebody" that is running more miles, running faster, running more races, doing tougher workouts, and in better shape than others.
Here are the awesome DT have created some wonderful cards for your inspiration...
♥ 1 cup all-purpose flour
A billboard erected in one of the city’s most racially diverse neighborhoods featured an African slave with the biblical quote, “Slaves, obey your masters.” It lasted less than a day before someone tore it down.
Picture 18 Beat Hidden Bang-up 1(B1) in basement
